Swift Code: BNORPHMM
An ice-cold can of Cherry Coke instead of a healthy bottle of water. Family pictures scrolling across the computer’s screen saver. A text message alert on the cell phone disrupting the present moment. An afternoon of playing in the crisp fallen autumn leaves instead of raking them up and disposing of them. Making mental lists of things to do the following day instead of focusing on the disagreeable at hand. Going to the grocery store when hungry and buying far more than what is on the list. Santa bringing gifts or an Easter bunny hopping in to leave baskets filled with tasty treats and little trinkets … and absolutely no emphasis on Jesus, His birth, death, and resurrection. Reciting the alphabet and counting to 20 instead of squirming during a haircut.
I know IUI doesn’t have great odds, but I like thinking of it as “sperm fast pass”. My husband seems to like this description. For all I know my mucus is making it even harder for his oddly shaped sperm and there’s no one left to get to the egg. The fact that I’ve never been pregnant makes me think there’s a problem with the sperm getting to and fertilizing the egg. If my eggs are crappy, wouldn’t that result in a chemical pregnancy? For IUI they will take the best sperm available and give them the red carpet treatment. No waiting through the fun house maze of the cervix and getting lost. No goopy mucus to potentially slow them down. Just the wild wild west of the uterus. Who knows how many sperm get caught up in my cervix and never make it to the promised land. I think out of all problems to have, an IUI will favor our particular issues best. If we have to move onto IVF, so be it.
SEASONED FLOUR: Mix all of the ingredients together, and then dredge pieces of chicken with the flour. Dip in two beaten eggs and then dip again in the flour(It may help to use a spoon to help you roll the meat around in the seasoning.). It may be easier to remove the bone from the chicken pieces, for a quicker cooking time. Fry the pieces until crisp, and then place in a baking tray and bake for 20 minutes or until cooked thoroughly.
This article fits the MO of the latter and, in this case I think they’ve given a free hit to one of the big beer barons*. It claims to have ‘unearthed’ the most popular beers in Melbourne. And by ‘beers’, they mean Victoria Bitter – VB – and by ‘most popular’ they mean the stuff sold through Melbourne’s largest single beer-barn style retailer – Woolworth’s, which includes Dan Murphy’s cellars and a thousand hotel bottle shops.
*chinese five spice is made of: cinnamon, anise, ginger and cloves. if you don't have it, shake into the sugar a tiny amount of those spices instead. a. tiny. amount.
(2) The Bible says so (it’s in there somewhere, you just have to know where to look — my cousin Cletus says he seen it once!)
My grandparents were not "interesting" to me, I'm ashamed to admit now. Grandma always had a litany of complaints, and Grandpa, if he spoke, exhibited a Buddha-like patience when Grandma interrupted him. He would fall silent until she finished whatever tangent she was on, and then he would simply pick up where he left off, as if the interruption never took place. In the next room, they had an organ I liked to play, and like most American kids who only knew one tune, I banged out a number-by-number rendition of "The Entertainer" over and over again while they talked, before wandering outside to play.
While the actual image, seen above, is by no means the most interesting illustration that could have been produced for this project, the basic idea behind it—that architects, sociologists, and even behavioral psychologists could someday team up to explore a new architecture with deliberately cultivated neurological side-effects—suggests a moral risk to the design of private space that deserves further exploration. In fact, the idea that we could build a kind of psychological sacrifice zone in the basement of a residential high-rise is a narratively compelling one. Perhaps an entire district of the city could be architecturally adapted for the needs of self-experimentation, testing your own limits in the face of strange ornament and topologically inconsistent space. You receive a prescription for a five-hour visit to the Extra Borough, and you walk in, alone, faced with odd, windowless buildings and empty squares on either side. It is an urban arena for a new breed of psychological X-Games.
"Sure...SLURRRPY...is....honey...SLURP, SLURP".
Guern remarks that the Britons cut off the feet of the dead Romans after a battle, so they couldn't walk into the afterlife.
Now mind you, he did get a lecture hall full of giggles and many jokes, but I did find these words to live by in vet school. (My apologies to any men following this blog). I thought of this as this city girl encountered bulls, boars and of course stallions in our clinical rotations, you think of these animals differently and you are more likely not to get hurt.
Goose Island IPA, 5.9% abv, 355mls, Units : 2.09
"Your payment is late."
Of course, the ones that are past this stage really could move past that and work on something more challenging. How to combine those two levels at once? That is the question.... I may let the more advanced ones in a group play some of the problem solving games on my iPad and iPod while I work with the ones that are struggling. The children are getting really good at playing these games without any adult intervention, so this little plan just might work! I’ll be letting you know. And speaking of technology....
The ordinance makes it illegal for anyone that hosts (or allows) a gathering when that person knows, or reasonably should know, that an underage person is consuming any alcohol on their property. If one is caught hosting such an event, that person will be fined as a misdemeanor.
“How many men were in the Cadillac?”
Ratebeer.com has released its 2011 "Best" list, and once again, the Stout is king. That irritates me. I love a good Imperial Stout as much as the next person, but there are a disproportionate number of them in the top 25, in my not-so-humble opinion. That said, it was great to see Florida - and Tampa Bay in particular - getting some serious props in the listings. No "beer culture" my ass!
Your end goal for a software project should be to deliver high quality software that meets the needs of the client using reusable and maintainable code. Before coding begins, you should make a list of success criteria that you judge the project on.
Because of Nana’s condition, rumors spread that the HerShe will disband. Nana’s voice has always been the band’s strength and now that she has a cyst in her nodules, she won’t be able to sing further. This sad event brought back the happy memory of both Eden and HerShe prior to their debut. Such a blissful bunch they are. Now, everything is falling. But before it all ends, both bands had their farewell treat to the fans, promising a come back.
No. I didn’t go and talk nicely to them for weeks to INSPIRE them to go and do their very basic democratic and civil responsibility. I was too fucking busy trying to run the world.
Conditions can make you stop
Starting a thank-you note is easy. Begin with these two words: “Thank you.”
God sent us down together with different gifts and talents as stewardships necessary to the happiness and success of the whole unit. The most basic and essential unit being family. When one member selfishly hordes their gift or is pushed away or fails to adequately utilize that gift the whole unit suffers in want. No one can claim that their part is more essential as others, the blanket is as important as the grill is as important as the ice chest is as important as the bread and chips, etc. The family runs into great trouble when members start extorting their talents against each other. (I’ll only give you a soda if you give me a bag of chips.) Only when we cooperate and share alike, is everyone happy and the unit effective.
Superchief are still establishing their indentity but “Corporate Dynamite” is definitely a huge step forward for Superchief so look left and right for explosions. This album gets more than just a pass mark.
And everybody’s felt lost
Aldo Leopold was one of America’s most famous conservationists, but he wasn’t always an environmentalist. He was a hunter before he became he became passionate about conservation and ironically it was through hunting that it happened. A profound experience up close and personal with nature changed his life, and his motivation. Aldo was with a group of friends hunting wolves to clear the mountain in order to hunt deer. Aldo shot one particular wolf. He looked into the eyes of the dying wolf and watched a fierce green fire dying in her eyes. At that moment he realized that something in the mountain, something in him was also dying. It could not ever be recaptured. It was after looking at this fierce green fire dying that Aldo Leopold’s life was changed and he went on to become one of the most significant American environmentalists of the twentieth century.
We all know the Bobnoxious love the basketball, beer, music, free beer, and big events. And the Bobnoxious tries to make himself center of said storm. And the Bobnoxious has big time fun and nothing gets broken.
However, the Emancipation Act was not made retroactive, meaning that O’Connell had either to seek re-election or to attempt to take the oath of supremacy. When O’Connell attempted to take his seat without taking the oath of supremacy, Solicitor-General Nicholas Conyngham Tindal moved that his seat be declared vacant and another election ordered; O’Connell was elected unopposed on 30 July 1829. Lastly he campaigned for the repeal of the Act of Union which combined Ireland and Great Britain. In fact, the street that the General Post Office is on, site of the Easter Uprising in Dublin, is O’Connell Street.
Try love.
The fact is that I simply cannot be counted on to water all summer long. I lose my impetus in the heat of late July, so drip lines on a timer are just my speed. I am thinking that if I could just get my whole family on a drip line, this mother gig would be cake!
Payments for the three others were suspended, pending the results of an investigation by the administration’s Office of Inspector General, the source said.
“The overall tone of the conversation was one of two people really connecting in an honest way, and going far beyond the formal academic exercise that many of
The ecclesiastical province of Baltimore at this time comprised the whole United States, and hence the Sixth Provincial Council was able to issue decrees for the entire country.
Take a look at some of the other link-ups in this increasingly small – dare I say, vicious? – circle. In August NYSE acquired Tokyo-based firm Metabit. This outfit ‘helps hedge funds and others trade as quickly and smoothly as possible on electronic markets across Asia and in Australia.’ Blimey, that sounds like a good idea for the ordinary investor: high speed hedge funds in dark pools…result!
I chatted with Denise for a while longer, and she said she'd buy the Minding Ben as well as come to my book party. It was only after I left her to go find my children did I wonder which "some" she categorized me with.
I made "Reeses" as my cookie to exchange, as well as a few appetizers to munch on (and keep our blood sugar stable!). J. supplied the fun platters and yummy drinks--sparkling apple cider with fresh raspberries and a grapefruit punch with lime and mint.
Source: Star Today via allkpop
Paper and Such - Tender Hearted stamp set
When push came to shove, my skills as coder were more valuable than my skills as CEO.
Boy Named Sue, Johnny Cash at San Quentin
- 5 parts mayonnaise
"You're scared aren't you," the driver yelled at the deputy during the chase. The identity of the 20-year-old cameraman remains a mystery. The 8-minute video shows him honking and getting the deputy to pull over. He then confronts the officer and the deputy lets the driver go.
While this is where the market found its footing previously in mid-March, it is still a shallow correction within a wider historical context. Usually significant lows are made when the HSNSI falls to negative (meaning a suggested short exposure to the market).
I cannot recommend Bordello of Blood. It does not even qualify as being so bad, it is entertaining to mock. It might have been that had another actor played Rafe and stuck to the script, but I have doubts. The film cannot decide what it wants to be--an absurd comedy or a post modern vampire mythology. The CGI is pretty decent for a 1996 release, but that is not enough reason to seek the movie out. It killed the planned franchise, save for a small DVD released film in 2001 which flopped badly. Skip Bordello of Blood and leave it up to the imagination why the storied franchise ended with it.
In an Instant, the sounds of the park resumes -
An attack has been made upon my belief system that I view as an attack on religion altogether in the media. Even though I have my issues with Newt Gingrich and his lack of morality in marriage, he was right when saying that the media is having an all out attack on religion.
Friday’s Quizzler is……….
If you have to cheat you’re obvious not fully devoted to this individual and you’re holding on to a dead relationship. Free your partner so you can find yourself and so your partner can take their devotion and love else where. #BAM Lies hurt its playing on ones intelligence, practically decieveing.
I will NOT tell people to donate to charity because I feel it is not in my place to do so.
I love this stuff! I think this is my third or fourth bottle. I've been using micellar water (Bioderma Ceraline) as my main remover, but I'd still buy another bottle of this to have on hand.
We humans are funny… we LOVE when life is good. Even when the good seems to be wearing off… just incase it is good again, we stay where the energy has changed. We really don’t like change that much… for fear of whats beyond that which is changing.
12. Initiates new U.S. Treasury Bank System in alignment with Constitutional Law
6 - Goldie Hill - I Let The Stars Get In My Eyes - 2:36
Blood Rights is an Urban Fantasy book with a mix-mash of supernatural creatures; Fae, Fallen Angles, Varcolai (shifters), ghosts, Comarré and vampires. All these creatures live in secret from the humans.
Which was a lot easier and faster than I had expected. Didn´t kill the blowdryer, and I don´t think it will have a huge impact on our electricity bill, either. And, yeah, I didn´t blow dry my hair that morning. Now that I see the pic, it does look kinda messy. Oh well. Blowdryers are for crafts, and hair is supposed to be messy, I think.
Here are the questions set for me:
"...However, it is a basic principle of relations between States that we treat each other's diplomatic representatives with civility and respect, regardless of any policy differences. To do otherwise would seriously undermine the ability of states to conduct international relations."
Favorite number: 43
The marvellous display--no wonder the books sold out! I was tempted to buy one myself!
The breed is a medium-sized, but muscular dog. They are equipped with webbed toes for swimming and are highly intelligent. PWDs have a single-layered coat that does not shed and therefore their presence is tolerated extremely well among many people who suffer from dog allergies.
I like doing films. I don’t think one has to choose one thing. Filmmakings and writings, I like both in a sense that they can provide me very different method via different vision-story, I think film media is great, modern and complicated – that is the charm and power of the visual world when you actually comes from the word-world, the literature world….
2tsp Dessicated coconut
If one is fortunate enough to come to the point of bhakti-yoga, it is to be understood that he has surpassed all the other yogas. Therefore, to become Kṛṣṇa conscious is the highest stage of yoga, just as, when we speak of Himalayan, we refer to the world’s highest mountains, of which the highest peak, Mount Everest, is considered to be the culmination.
Looking at performance of different market segments, “Capitals and Major Cities” once again recorded the most pronounced decline with a fall of 8.7%, followed by the municipalities on the “Mediterranean Coast” with an 8.1% fall. The “Metropolitan Areas” followed with a decline of 6.5% compared to January 2011.
“Trust the Lord with all your heart and lean not on your own understanding.” Proverbs 3:5
And still it is too late – for those feathers can never be gathered up again. Words, once said, can never be unsaid and reports once written can never be unwritten.
Fitter Sh*tter man,
It feels like I'm breathing
No, this is genuine Steampunk Giftwrap, for wrapping smallish non-animate objects to delight and surprise your friends and laboratory assistants.
The focus of Siganeui Choom may be on a few, specific families only, not even giving a sense of the Coreanos more widely, but the questions the documentary raises on identities, on belonging and not belonging at the same time, on living in one geographical and cultural present, but having and (somewhat) holding on to a very different past, will resonate with anyone living within that split diasporic reality – it certainly did with me.
But the best thing I watched this year was "Avatar: The Last Airbender," the Nickelodeon TV series. Don't even mention the movie, which compares to the TV series kind of like if you were expecting a Nintendo Wii for Christmas, and instead got a box of turkey poo: Aang is, far and away the most likeable protagonist I've seen in an animated series: he's human, he's funny, he's a hero, he learns, but he's also totally a kid - fun-loving and mischievous, even when he has to save the world. His journey is authentic and the choices he faces are smart, challenging, and, when you see what he chooses, satisfying. So go watch it.
It's time...NOW!
- Marianne Design
We will announce the winners here on November 30th (which, not so coincidentally, is the date of our two-year anniversary!).
that we’re one and the same.
The slant of a smile as she accepted her third cup.
The Designers view
after review by the house of
The next night, House Speaker John A. Boehner (R-Ohio) snuck into a secret meeting with President Obama to launch an effort for a “big deal” including hundreds of billions of dollars in new revenue.
The Orangutan Project told Our World Today that the remaining forested area of the PT KAL estate contains a high-density population of orangutans and covers about 2900 hectares.
NZOYW Blog (nzoywblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Olive Oil: 1 teaspoon
1. The camp of GMA has made conflicting statements as to whether she really has metabolic bone disease.
Welcome to our new blog. This is a blog all about spending great times with your family, at some of the best festivals in the world, we are a London based family but love exploring festivals all over the world. This blog is being started to offer advice, reviews and information on taking kids to festivals, we want you to have the best times at festivals but also know when you have kids it brings a whole new dimension to going to festivals, both good and bad!
But then it all crashed and burned when I heard The Catch. The inevitable, evil, blood-thirsty Catch that always creeps into our hopes and dreams, laying waste to everything in its path.
Much has been made of the long overdue plan to update the laws of succession, notably regarding sex and religion (or rather the religion of a consort)
You all know I'm a great fan of history, and I have a habit of drilling down to the details with Google. There's a lot more to this Baltimore and Drum Point Railroad. Here's a starting point of interest:
Atlanta Falcons: B-
This was beer which he was obliged to taste in significant amounts in order to properly assess the quality and character of a product which he was chiefly responsible for.
Miniatures
At the apartment next to the Museum (within a block of the Clinton headquarters hotel), the normally composed door man - a member of the working class, uttered some colorful 4 and 7 letter words which cannot be repeated here to describe this spectacle of our nation's rulers - past and present - surrounded by their public servants - totally oblivious to their imperial appearance and the interruption of nomal life on the streets of NYC.
it is a rare occasion for one of us to recollect these works at the break of dawn (which is anytime before 8a for us college students)…and of course, the 8a studio class will be in full swing before we even greet the day.
The term yoke shows up in the Bible a few times and I apologize but it's been a very long day so I won't be able to give it proper justice. I'll have to go back another time and study it more fully.
Brothers and Sisters.
This cocktail, named for a 1922 Rudolph Valentino film, is a relative rarity: a mixed drink made with scotch. The combination of scotch, sweet vermouth, oj and cherry brandy might seem a little unusual, but you will only think that until you take your first sip. It's perfectly balanced, not too fruity, not too scotch-y. (Although it's difficult to imagine how something could taste too much like scotch.)
Red Coral Bracelet - handmade by my mum!!
Then, using the Birthday Bash Cricut cartridge, cut the embellishments to decorate the frame. For example, I cut a Birthday Dog in a funky color and added glitter to give some bling.
Unfortunately, this version of CM9 for the HTC One X is only compatible with the Tegra 3version of the phone. We’re sure that a version for the LTE-capable Snapdragon S4 HTC One X will be made available at some point in the future.
it – getting weaker
2. Have a Go
4. Rose International — Chesterfield, Mo. (CEO Sue Bhatia)
Those are the best things.
The courtroom will bellow
First is that a person with no pulse who isn't breathing is dead. We, the general public, like to think of a person who just slipped into this state as alive yet in serious trouble. Nope, they're dead. This is the basis for idea that when trying to bring this person back, there isn't much you can do to make them worse off. It's why cracking ribs while performing chest compressions is perfectly acceptable.
I was talking to one of the girls at the dinner who got married a couple years ago. I asked her for her advice on wedding planning, and she told me to figure out what the top three most important things about the wedding are for me, and not to stress about the rest.
He simply thought he could get away with it, that's the bottom line. When will we wake up and protect our most vulnerable, our children, from these predators?
I think these rings are such a lovely idea, and of course, I was touched that she had sweetly thought of me and sent me one. The rings came at a time when it was difficult to practice thankfulness. Yet, it was also during this time, that I was gently reminded that being grateful is a way of living. We have to deliberately live a life of gratitude, in the same way that we choose to be happy. It is about opening our hearts and minds to look out for and appreciate the good things that happen to us every day, even on the days that are stormy.
While many people will ask you when your wedding is and tell you they are excited for the big day it's up to you and your groom, and your budget, to decide who is on that final guest list. Don't add someone who you don't want there because they think they'll be invited. And definitely don't add people you can't afford to have.
I think the original Alaska Airlines stuff came out in the early '80's and I think the great Joe Sedelmaier was involved in the early days. Here's just a tip of the iceberg selection of ads from yesteryear and yesterdecade that prove the point that as long as you've got something interesting and differentiating to say about the product you don't have to reinvent the wheel every time you come to write a new ad.
But let’s get to something else…
I have found that I eat a better breakfast on days I work if I have something already prepared and ready to go. I try to avoid fast-food breakfasts, although I don’t mind Subway’s breakfast sandwiches! It is easy to make those in a healthy way. Still, that is money spent when I have breakfast items at home…just not enough time in the morning to prepare it.
Now look, I know they’re still plenty of Obama supporters among us but I find it very difficult to understand why so many people still love, honor and support this guy. I voted for this guy too. I fell for his smooth talk, cool demeanor and wide open smile. I’ve always been a sucker for tall dark and handsome but if he wasn’t lying then he’s lying now and I for one am mad as hell and I’m not going to take it anymore.
It suddenly dawned on me how much I am like President Obama. We both went to college. We both lived in Chicago. We both have two published autobiographies.
Afghanistan being the main subject of discussion, the military chiefs of NATO’s 28 member states, collectively the Military Committee, presumably met with the chiefs of defense staff of the 22 non-NATO nations supplying the alliance with troops for the war in Afghanistan.
9B. Panel: The Role of the Artist in the Local Landscape: Examining Marshall McLuhan and Sheila Watson’s Relationship to Canadian Modernism – TEL 150
………To be reborn
4. The Countess and Victoria go shopping. Boring.
With that, the formal interview ended, but the conversation continued. Like two friends that say goodbye and then walk each other to their cars. J.J. and I went on to talk about our kids and our families and being yourself as part of a unit and making compromises without being compromised and how fine a line that can be. He shared some child-rearing wisdom from James Baldwin and then we really ended the interview, as both of us had to go pick up our kids.
Ah Christmas Eve, a time of joy and celebration even if you lived in a disco era bomb shelter. After the kids fell asleep in their sleeping bags, visions of canned goods and gold bars dancing in their heads, Brenda put up the artificial tree. Then she hung the unbreakable ornaments, draped the flame-resistant garlands, and broke out hypoallergenic fiberfill snow for under the tree.
When you open and listen to your heart, you are not bothered by problems or differences in people. Relationships bring great joy, we are more accepting of others short comings, we easily forgive, and sharing love becomes our greatest treasure.
"Are you sure they're bites?" I said, "I can't even see bite marks."
and keep going after they have all gne,
In the best interest of the Cardinals, the smartest move would be to make a trade with the Nationals to retain the rights to Komatsu. Erik Komatsu made the 25-man roster in the spring over Adron Chambers, another young promising outfielder.
The bonus is, these babies are gluten-free, which can be a nice change from the typical, wheat-centric breakfasts we all gravitate towards. Yes, they contain oats, but if you purchase gluten-free oats you’ll be guaranteed that you are getting a product that is safe even if you are Celiac.
You are about to cook your prawns.
33. Been suspended from school? - Definitely not. See answer #18.
Aspirations: Family, Grilled Cheese
A quick and delicious breakfast is that which is expected during the weekends, this yummy breakfast is not just quick but also healty as it consumes less amount of oil and includes more than a variety of vegetables, most importantly its a filling breakfast hence consumption of junk such as chips, chocolates , biscutes etc… are reduced .
Abby waved her hand in front of Sam's face. "Yoo-hoo. Anybody home?"
Here is the recipe for Mi Ku
He also went on to say “In my opinion the current contractual arrangements between the DWP and General Practice are unsustainable. The WCA as performed by Atos is not effective or a safe method of determining “Fitness To Work” and this must be addressed.”
My only objection to hotel bedding is all the tucking that goes on. As a rather proud victim of Restless Leg Syndrome, I derive great pleasure from drifting off to sleep while my feet rotate spastically in circles. Such movement is not possible when the top sheet, duvet, blanket and bedspread are anchored under the mattress by an over-eager chambermaid who thinks all that work is getting her a bigger tip. There’s no line item on my reimbursable business expense report for lodging gratuities anyway.
Meanwhile, this past week was a busy one. We started back into our school routine, returned to our regular sports and music activities, started a new one (DD added in Irish dance lessons which she loved, loved, loved!) and did some make-up gymnastics classes from when we were out of town. It was busy, busy! I'll be writing up a couple of school-related posts in the next day or so.
from monster PA speakers around the
The comptroller's office says it audits all state bills prior to payment, including personal income tax refunds.
( Billy’s Thoughts – As I have posted before why do those who back special rights for gays have freedom to state their views but not Coach Brown and us who feel like he does.)
Milligan and I sat silently in the heat and smoked for what seemed like an eternity but which was in reality a little over an hour. We scanned the haze on the horizon and there they appeared, the posse had arrived. At first they were just a shimmering in the heat that slowly turned a rusty colour from the dust out of which emerged a column of men on horseback. “How many? I count eighteen” “Yeah I get nineteen, so we cant beat em, well this is it, you ready?” “Bout as ready as ever for a gunfight, not so sure about that there cliff though” Milligan smiled “See you on the other side.
So this is a great long novel, twice as long as Moby-Dick. For months after finishing the Melville, I wished I was still reading it. I wonder if I'll miss Dickens and his London in the same way. Great Expectations and A Tale of Two Cities, novels I've read in the last couple of years, didn't hang on to me, but Our Mutual Friend is a much better book than either of those novels. It's richer, with more depth and a physical reality--a tactile quality--I've not encountered in any of his other work. Granted I've only read three other Dickens novels. Anyway, the more I read of Mr Dickens, the more of him I want to read. That's a good thing, right? I hope that after Our Mutual Friend I won't be disappointed by the rest of his books.
On the whole the recipes have an emphasis on seasonality and local produce, are uncomplicated, and offer a selection covering every time of year. Hix makes it a point to feature lesser-known, more sustainable fishes such as Coley, Huss and Ling and also encourages foraging for those lucky enough to be near field or shore, with recipes like Seashore Salad and Fried Duck’s Egg with Spider Crab and Sea Greens. Aside from the egg shooters, I tried the Summer Vegetable Broth which was fresh, light and perfectly suited to the current spell of glorious weather. The silken quivering Elderflower and Buttermilk Pudding I trialed recently for a dinner party was equally summery and luscious.
I would much rather be planting out my own stuff but for now this will have to do
Funkyness Jam
Do the rest with the chappati dough by adding the filling.
"I guarantee you, every single person that signed up for Instagram on that first day thought it was a filter app, and that's it," remarks Systrom. But the "filter" aspect (which I talked about in part 1) is not what it was really about, and it's certainly not why Facebook paid 1 billion dollars to acquire Instagram. It's really all about sharing photos. I'm not on Instagram (yet) so I can't speak from experience, but to hear Systrom speak about it, you would think you were about to embark on the "It's A Small World" ride at Disneyland. He calls it "one of the first truly international social networks" because the means of communication is visual rather than verbal:
With just this book of poetry that I call my own
Both of these web applications can serve you well, provided you are honest about which sites you actually waste your time on. So it really all comes down to which browser you prefer. Also, I realize that you can easily “hack” either of these extensions by simply surfing on another browser, but honestly I think the strength of these applications is that they set visible benchmarks that allow you to see how much time you spend (and waste) on certain websites.
Well, it makes me high
This really upset me, because I wonder what someone would think to find this online and not know there were two of us out there. Two who are very different in all aspects. Well, with the exception of the name and hopefully the love for Colorado. I wondered if I should change my blog name, but I refuse. "The Coloradolady Blog" is something I have worked hard to build. It is honest, and real. It is not all happy go lucky, there are real struggles and writing about them helps. But overall I try and promote good things and thoughts. If someone has a problem with that, well, that really is not my problem.
"Lierre de Poison"
Martin Smith
F: Let me sway, let me kiss you,
That’s great and all, but why do they dress like the ladies above? And why do they trade beads? I don’t get it, but they all went to the Electric Daisy Carnival in Los Angeles this past weekend. What’s with the tight clothes, the bras, the neon, the furry hooker boots, and the prevalence of Hello Kitty? Someone help me comprehend. Dennen??
Last week, who was in town, ostensibly to clean out his summer place on the nearby New Jersey Shore but Mainely Dad, or as he's known to his friends, Duane.
Oh, my. How true that is...
Session Description:
Kosher salt and freshly ground pepper
A gel nails kit typically consists of the basic manicure set, such as buffers, files, tips, and so on, UV light, gel brushes, gels, gel cleansers, and gel wipes. Gel nails is not easy to make, but it is a technique that can be easily learned.
Back to music, there’s a couple of decent gigs coming up in the shire of Leicester which I will blog about soon.
Let me reiterate how much I love that you choose these words with multiplicity—as noun and adjective in this case. But as timely benefits, my first boon came in moving to Seattle: volunteer work with Richard Hugo House, the writing group that made writing an even more significant part of my week, the landscape that inhabited my breath, my introduction to Port Townsend as a writerly and productive space. The next boon: my community at Western Washington University. I was in a remarkably supportive group of writers during the period of getting my Master’s. We were so fortunate to have that tight community during those two years. Third boon: my job at Pace, just in the nick of time.
11 Too Tender To Touch
Since we didn’t plan to stain this until the last minute, we weren’t concerned with the fact that you could see white spots on the subfloor beneath. We knew that those would get covered up when we painted the floor. Since we didn’t do that, something had to be done. At night, with the overhead lights on, those places GLARED white.
"Of course."
in the liminal world
I missed the whole scenario of what was happening during the Month of May! Everyone was talking about the end of the world because of a date-setter named Camping. I think I heard the news the day before it was to happen. OK You should know that date setting is not only an insult to God, it is anathema. God has forbidden setting the time of His Son’s return for the restoration of Israel. Acts 1: 7 “It is not for you to know times or seasons that the Father has fixed by his own authority.”
From 1961 until 1968, very little is known about this period other than BHO is reared in Hawaii with SAD, MD and SADI centering on EWC-HU. During this period, SAD1 becomes associated with Dr. Gregory Bateson’s expertise and cover, Anthropology (Study of Culture).
I curtsy slightly and say “Why, thank you Antoine. You are too kind.”
A new semester is starting soon, my final semester in college, so things in my life are changing. I have to give up my job with Ginny, as I will be doing a 40 hour a week internship as well as another class. If you haven't met Ginny yet, she is a girl I've been taking care of on weekends for over a year. She has multiple disabilities, so things can be difficult. One thing she really enjoys is when I paint her nails. You can read more about her the first, second, and third times I painted her nails.
But, she said, American Indian self-determination does not come easy.
In keeping our bookshelves practical, the Pottery Barn clock counts down to nap and bedtime, and the kleenex are essential for a baby's constant runny nose.
The seven members are Susil, Ranum Mina (Opar), Francis Harden (Simanggang), Johnichal Rayong (Engkilili), Wong Soon Koh (Bawang Assan), Lee Kim Shin (Senadin) and Tiong Thai King (MP for Sibu).
More on the homebrewing saga soon.
He was answering the question I’d asked.
The web is changing everything, of course: libraries, librarians, users and statistics. In a knowledge economy, statistical data must be treated as an economic rather than as an administrative resource. Statistical production should be judged by the same standards as other forms of knowledge production. Libraries are knowledge factories rather than media collections. Statistical systems should produce the data librarians need to sustain and develop their services – as well as the data politicians need to make decisions and evaluate policies.
would continue. While we
Eventually, “Obama” submits and/or the government is toppled.
Clive Watkinson (Con) 94
People: And with your spirit.
I have made this card for Pat in return. I was impressed some years ago by the work of Margaret Talbot - silk embroideries rich in detail, using the inspiration of the flushwork patterns on East Anglian churches. These are patterns made by alternating flint with masonry and they are usually religious or heraldic symbols. Something about the reverse of this piece of silk, woven for the tie industry, suggested heraldic shields. My partner's family initial is M, so I used a piece of gold thread for that. Beneath is the card from my village, showing the National Trust merchant's house.
The presentation should be such that all parties are engaged. Try having an interactive component that will involve young readers in the audience. You don't necessarily want people to just sit passively.
The next Meeting is on 2nd June. Redirection point to be announced in the Bulletin.
I feel crappy. I've had a head cold since Thursday. I can feel it getting better but that last little bit doesn't want to let go. Needless to say, no church today.
To a certain extent... Yes. But mostly, my answer to that is No.
My relationship with myself is evolving. I currently am involved in a women group which encompasses the power within and techniques to manage our stress, trauma, anger, displacement of; and emotions.
If I see someone has a good set of obviously read Dickens, Austen, Trollope, say for starters, I know we'll have something to talk about. Likewise The Myth of the Goddess or If This is a man or If on a Winter's Night a Traveller ...or Ulysses (unread copies don't count) or lots of books on mythology.
We finally decided to take a break and grab a bite to eat around 3:30pm. Shortly before 5pm (2 1/2) hours before posted sunset) we went back out. Our first stop was an overlook of the Lake high high above Incline Village, Nevada. The light was still a bit hazy resulting in a flat look to the scene. We discussed ways of handling the low-contrast during post processing, then moved back down to lake-level with a stop at Sand Harbor State Park. Arriving at 5:30pm, I knew we were starting to get into the period where the sun’s angle was dropping low enough to allow for more delineation of shadows. We were not disappointed. It’s amazing how images start to appear much more readily once the light gets good. The above image was captured about 70 minutes prior to sunset. As you can see, the rock shadows were beginning to elongate creating the illusion of depth. Moreover, the low sun angle resulted in a warmer light evidenced by the foreground sand.
The enemy was routed and fled like the cowards they are.
"Give me that bottle opener. You want another beer?"
1-Cup Quick Cooking Oats
Fast forward a few months. I’m out grocery shopping with my mother and something on the ubiquitous bookracks catches my eye. A paperback, but the cover is silver. And shiny. And it had the barest hint of a boy’s face, really just the shape of the face and the hair. And no type on the cover. When I picked it up, I realized the boy’s face was a die-cut…there was a freaking hole cut into the cover and the face was on the next page in…like a double cover. And inside, when I lifted that cover, I knew I’d find the name Stephen King. I did. And the book was called The Shining.
It's paper secrets 3rd Birthday so to celebrate we will create in 3's.
No matter who you have to buy for, if it’s a woman, I’ll let you in on something, the easiest thing to buy for us… Beauty products!! We love them, we can’t have enough, that’s right, even if you think we have enough, we want more, and lots of them!
Beings of Light are the source of all the energy that is expressed as
You can also do the old fashioned fishing game where you make a fishing pole with a magnet on the end and pick up little paper fish with paperclips on them.
Bloom day in the winter wouldn't be complete without another shot of my lovely Daphne odora. Her blooms are few now, but I have great expectations for winters to come!
User-contributed Peak Condition Updates
Mare51089: DUDE!
“There is a standard procedure for investigations, which will be applied to all, no discrimination, no bias. I do not think NUS is trying to play delay tactics. The Sun Xu saga has received such a wide public interest and there is no way people will just forget the incident.”
These are some of my experiments with inkpads & you will see how some maintained their colour, while others faded.
All people were actually willing to support the movement, even including the young male graduates here in Australia. Ajak, one of the organizers of the fundraising, encourages all young men to get along. “You men, you have to contribute, these are the girls whom you go yearly and pinch off your wives among them from overseas. Support us so that we educated them,” she said. This is an encouraging reality.
Then the soldiers of the governor took Jesus into the governor’s headquarters, and they gathered the whole battalion before him. And they stripped him and put a scarlet robe on him, and twisting together a crown of thorns, they put it on his head and put a reed in his right hand. And kneeling before him, they mocked him, saying, “Hail, King of the Jews!” And they spit on him and took the reed and struck him on the head. And when they had mocked him, they stripped him of the robe and put his own clothes on him and led him away to crucify him.
Getting it sold
When he had purchased these policies, his agent hadn’t pointed out these distinc­tions, and Dr. Richter himself had failed to do his own due diligence. He had never read his policies through carefully before or after purchasing them. Although only 57 when his symptoms began, he was now nearing 59 and his consultant had to break the news to him that he was only eligible for lifetime benefits on two of the policies instead of all four.
This man has been disgusted by me, burned by me, confused by me, fed-up with me, annoyed by me and so enraged by me.
There are two sides to a large, inefficient civil service. As the numbers come down, you need to increase the rewards to retain the better people and improve the quality of entrants.
Up onna housetop, the reindeers pause,
You can order by the whole ($2.75/lb hanging weight), the half ($3.00/lb. hanging weight), the quarter ($3.25/lb hanging weight), or a 25 lb. beef variety box for $150, which contains steaks, roasts, round steaks, hamburger patties, ground beef, etc.
You won’t want
~Add texture, a print or both! It can be studded shoes or a magnificent new scarf!
Too preachy? Maybe. But also real. This is currently the revelation windmilling inside my head.
“How I suppose to know?” I replied innocently.
20g glucose syrup
Dividing up your story text into double-page spreads makes it easier to visualise the structure of the book (twelve is a good number of spreads). It also helps you to see if there are enough varied illustration possibilities. Some writers even make rough dummies for their own use (with scruffy line drawings for their eyes only!). I think it's important to remember that the turning of the page forms part of the story telling. It’s another form of punctuation: a huge anticipatory
;and stop being a cryptoracist (if DPM actually is at all . . . by all accounts and non-MSM opinions he would appear so . . . ), allow ALL races to join UMNO, I’d vote for UMNO without issue, the corruption and other issues would determine the pecking order in a new UMNO that has the 3 items in it’s constitution and the new leaders (DPM Muddy and PM Najib, are you up to this?) will be those who granted the above 3 items.
- Come and go from the home at his leisure (no curfew enforceable)
I started a good book for the read-a-thon but didn't put it down and finished it. Started Dark Peril by Christine Feehan too, :/ can I wait?
11:30: Change diaper and head downstairs
Even so, some online hold’em sites do not permit players to multi-table, or possess a cap to the maximum quantity of tables you are able to play concurrently -At some sites this number is 4, at other people it’s 24-so you should do a little study should you strategy on multi-tabling to improve your rakeback.
Doing the color on color style of color/blending, you'll want to use a lighter touch on the paper stumps. If you're using a good OMS and a good paper, you shouldn't need to forcefully push the color around.
Recently I was introduced to a sandy-haired, smiling 26-year old with a crushing handshake. But he walked haltingly on two steel legs and his hip joints are also man-made so terrible were his wounds in a rocket attack in Iraq. He talked of friends who have died. He was 17 when he enlisted and the army is all he knows, he would go back to his unit. It did not surprise me when this clean cut young American told me he is a Southern Baptist…every bit a gentleman, he looked and acted the part. He confided that his mother has recently become adamantly against the War (though he did could not bring himself to engage in “political talk”). I know that this mother must be thinking… if only she had been pro-peace before her young son enlisted seven years ago.
I think it’s fair to say that in reaching this milestone, no one was more surprised than moi – that’s French for me for those of you who didn’t learn French by taking a class or listening to Miss Piggy and since she liked to interject French into her lines on the Muppet Show whenever I type or read “moi” I hear her voice. Now, that I think about it, you are probably more surprised than moi, but I just wanted an excuse to use “moi” in a sentence. You couldn’t have known how close I was because I don’t have that hit tracker visible on my blog. I do, however, occasionally look at my stats, so I saw the milestone approaching or rather I saw my blog hits approaching that milestone.
To not give up on me.
My first sampling of Red Chair is noted in an entry dated November 22, 2009, wherein I wrote:
I did post a Youtube video of an early version of the routine without some of the final postures – I intend to post another video on Yutube in 2012.
I think it involves LOTS of butter... good bye healthy food
Now I'm not really a jean wearing person. I use to love wearing them in high school, but when you are born with short arms like myself, it always makes it interesting to actually zip up and button those damn things. Especially if you are "cursed..oh I mean blessed, with big boobs. Talk about a pain in the butt!
Cheese: Tomme Crayeuse, an earthy buttery cheese from Savoie
All-innocent are you, and yet all-wise.
The ongoing debate about the nature of consciousness is in one sense a narrow-focus version of this broader question.
So far the vending machines aren’t international, so the hug bug hasn’t caught on worldwide yet, but I’m willing to tell people it is to see how many people I can make hug a vending machine. That’s not mean, is it?
In a small bowl, stir together:
I'm working on a new site that I can start up soon. It'll be a clean slate so to speak.
God speaks through his Word many times. 2 Timothy 3:16 says “All scripture is God-breathed.” God gave us his word for a purpose. One of my favorite things is when you’re reading a passage that you’ve read a whole lot of times, or know the story very well, but all of a sudden you notice something new. That’s really cool. One of the reasons a person can never get tired of reading the Bible. =)
(And less chunky, Precious Peanut.)
Al-Quds Day is an annual day of solidarity with the Palestinians and other oppressed peoples marked by Muslims around the world at the end of the holy month of Ramadan. (Al-Quds is the Arabic name for Jerusalem.) Rallies marking the day have been held in London annually since 1980. Supporters of the event in London this year include the Muslim Council of Britain, the Stop the War Coalition, Jews Against Zionism, the Islamic Forum of Europe and the Federation of Student Islamic Societies (FOSIS).
Oh, that's too bad, Sweetie, I consoled her, while mentally wringing my poor husband's neck. What do you think happened?
A hunger for things that are deeper
I think with collecting Sophia's name every time I get a new picture that is a wink. Because it brings such happiness to my heart to know someone other than myself is thinking of Sophia for one moment.
Idea 9: When such predictable patterns are interrupted, for example by the existence of another person who might perform an unpredictable action, the zero-positive individual can find this aversive and even terrifying. Hence, zero-positives typically resist change at all costs.
Allow your priorities to change. Allow yourself to make new friends, aside from the ones you shared with your ex. Find things that make you feel good about yourself and do them. Exercise, knit, play guitar, whatever.
During these past three and a half weeks I have been annoyed, bothered, but increasingly amused and happy with Herbert. One of the better aspects of living abroad was the need to walk everywhere and anywhere. I enjoy walking. I like the view from street level. I don’t mind buying only the groceries I can carry to my car…that’s parked five blocks away. It’s an interesting life change, but then, a welcomed one all in the same. I am thankful to have a job that allows for such a luxury as walking. I can walk to work!
I want to give something to everyone that enters. And I can't. So I'm going to pout.
4. On a business trip to Miami, my friend and I went to Bayside Market one night. While she was buying a snack, I stepped over to the railing overlooking the water. I was approached by a handsome young Latino in a sailor’s uniform who had just stepped off a boat. He came to me and in a low, seductive voice whispered sweet nothings in my ear and invited me on a romantic moonlight boat ride. Okay, okay. So he was speaking in Spanish and I didn’t understand a word. For all I know, he could have been telling me that I had broccoli stuck in my teeth or toilet paper stuck to my shoe. But it sounded romantic and he was quite handsome, so that’s my story and I’m sticking to it!
We've been trying to keep up with the regular stream of studies suggesting wine has all sorts of magical, mystical medicinal properties that will lead to better health, longer life, etc. Now, brews and spirits are getting some extra support.
Son: Where?
I compiled my prices from actual receipts, sales flyers, and writing some prices down as I browsed in the store. It's worth it to check out stores you haven't visited as well, or local sources like nearby farmers. It's a bit laborious at first, but once the Price Book is set up, it's easy to use. I've learned when a sale is a great deal, and when it's not really a sale at all. I've been surprised to learn that buying from the bulk bins is not always cheapest. There are grocery stores on the expensive side, but their sales are fantastic.
4th); 2007 Le Duc (UR 6th); 2008 Simon (UR 25th); 2011 Skippers Brig (9th)
snaking
It's going to be a good year!
6 - One man said he was unhappy about the fact that he had not been able to fully enjoy his holiday to Portugal. His hotel bed was 'too comfy' meaning that he overslept on more than one occasion when he would have 'preferred to be up early and making the most of it.'
Some time last month, I believe, I received an email from WordPress telling me I could share Spotfiy playlists within blog posts. *I love Spotify more than any other music streaming service because they have just about everything. Before it was available in the States, I had to use a proxy with my old British post code so I could play music. Those were dark times. In fact, with my last financial aid cheque, I’m considering getting a Kindle Fire but there’s no Spotify app. GET ON IT, AMAZON!! However, I’m not keen on the frequency of the adverts and those cheeky buggers will pause them when you lower the volume. But really, I’ll get a blearing ad for CHRIS BROWN’S LATEST VIOLENT HIT or SUBWAY, EAT FRESH SHIT! when I’m listening to, say… Beach House.
March 30th:
Few visions have ever undergone the scrutiny that these appearances of the Immaculate Virgin were subject to. Lourdes became one of the most popular Marian shrines in the world, attracting millions of visitors. Miracles were reported at the shrine and in the waters of the spring. After thorough investigation Church authorities confirmed the authenticity of the apparitions in 1862.
2. Live intentionally, not aimlessly: “Think nothing and do nothing without a purpose directed to God. For to journey without direction is wasted effort” (St. Mark the Ascetic, 5th century). “Therefore, whether you eat or drink, or whatever you do, do all to the glory of God.” (1 Corinthians 10:31)
04 - FVK – Sun's God
There's only one problem. It ain't working.
In fact, EDL JDiv was at that pro-terrorism talk at the London School of Economics (LSE), but because they were not University of London students, and the room was full of Muslim pro-terrorist scum, JDiv were turned away (as were about 40 other people). Believe me, if JDiv had got in there they would have made sure that talk was terminated and they would not have been intimidated. They would not just bleat like the pathetic children of UJS.
ISBN-13: 978-0736928823
Along with the Mayapples and Showy Orchids, the Trillium are in full bloom. i have always loved these trillium and found it interesting that the local/common name for these is Stinking Benjamin. Seems funny that such a lovely flower would have such an awful name. :)
Just shuffling of soldiers feet as they guarded the grave.
The book examines the effects of environments in which the human body never adapted and was never meant to experience, much less live in. It also provides examples of people who both survived such conditions and those who succumbed. The saddest of the latter, to me, was the story of Audrey Mestre, who attempted to beat her own record for free diving by ascending from a depth of 166 metres.
Heat the oil in the pan, saute onion until it turns soft. Add in garlic, cook until fragrant.
The scrapping of historic regimental names as part of defence cuts is a senseless body blow to the Army
I hope you have a blessed week and I'm so glad you stopped by. If you do, please leave a comment, so I can return the favor when I visit your blog. God bless.
So please
You feel you're walking on your own
She pulled back, turned to grab her bag, and exited, leaving him standing there.
Sugar to taste, a good few tablespoons. Use white or light brown sugar, dark sugar tends to spoil the colour. Honey is also possible.
april.15: i listened to Goyte sing on Saturday Night Live and i
And this damn snow ruined it all. Our plans turned into just that, plans – not realizations. I blame it on the ground hog and I blame it on Republicans for not believing in global warming. Clearly mother nature wanted to show her ass this winter. But so did D-magic lol.
One at a time, dip the bottom of the cupcake in chocolate (dip just until the top of the cupcake), insert the lollipop stick about half way into the cupcake and place the cupcake in the egg carton lollipop stick up to dry.
Clay Robinson surveys this scene, and knows exactly where he stands.
I should note that all Murdochs and the company’s representatives have consistently denied condoning e-mail hacking, phone hacking, paying off police and other accusations. We will have to wait for the legal systems and the parliamentary investigations to run their course to gain better understanding. But we can examine Murdoch’s newspapers.
But all those sentences don’t apply.
But now my beloved color is in the spotlight. On the one hand this means I'm very on trend for the moment. However, I can't help but worry that by this time next year, my Lady Grey coat will look dated and passe. And what about the Burda cover dress that I've just finished and not yet blogged about or even worn yet? (Here is a sneak peek.)
By a kiss.
And the cuckoo's sovereign cry
The photo I took turned out super washed out my the noon day light but I think it gives it a real faded seventies vintage look. And no I am not eight feet tall, the Lincoln has been lowered significantly with custom made springs by Eaton Detroit.
Nan wobbled off on her bike, some freakish cousin of science keeping her upright. Knowing the sequence of lights, I knew we were into the home run, the few seconds allotted for us, presumed reasonable drivers, to turn right was about to expire.
I am rapacious thoughts chained with rusty links
Now this obsession with financial matters did not turn me into a miser—far from it. Almost as important to me as survival money was money to fuck around—money for movies, books, magazines, music, photocopies of articles and pictures at libraries, occasional meals in restaurants. Indeed, this was the money I worked for. Money for bills never really seemed to be mine, though I often dipped into the bill money to pay for temporary good times.
A guy of twenty-five is at the top of his ego/responsibility ratio and reacted accordingly. After loading the car with booze, we hung around waiting for all the partiers to feature. Of course, we weren't going anywhere until the magic cash crossed my palms, but he strung it out. That's fine by me. Had he not paid, I'd be happy to drive off.
Coming in at number 5 is Florence Welch from Florence and the Machine, who I think is a great choice. She is individual and has fun with her fashion.
Pour all ingredients in a mixing glass, except the champagne, then add ice, shake and strain into a flute and top off with Champagne. Garnish with a kumquat floret and orange zest.
Position at 9:30 am Hawaii time, tues may 15: 23 degrees 34 minutes North, 154 degrees 13 minutes West
HT: As of today, I have five novels and one screenplay out.
I shall be updating you in a few minutes.
I see myself as a full time musician and flourishing.
This presented the doctors with a dilemma. Should they proceed
Sixteen years ago, Patricia (P.J.) Johnston of Des Moines made the front page of this paper for collecting her diploma from Drake University at just 19. “Johnston was reading books on French existentialism while others her age were still buying comic books,” wrote reporter Tom Alex of the young woman who majored in religion and philosophy, dabbled in music and astronomy and found time to take part in online discussions on the Bible.
So here's what I'm hoping to find under the tree on Christmas morning (if they'll fit!)
My strategy is working. I hug the treeline, unnoticed by the patrol. When the ruins are finally behind me, I return to the road. That was close. No telling what would have happened if I’d been spotted. Wait a second. What if like the giant, they did see me, but just didn’t care? Come on! I’m wearing armor, I have a mace. I’m threatening! As I look at one of my skinny arms, I realize that I am actually not threatening…at all. I guess I shouldn’t let my victory over Benor and my imaginary defeat of a Frost Troll go to my head. Plus, why am I wishing for things to attack me all of a sudden? I blame my upbringing. It all resurfaced after my scrap with Benor. No need to dwell on it now though. I can do that later, in the comfort of a bar.
Mark 8:30
"Every time I would see vegetables not just on my plate, but anywhere I would get feelings of panic, start sweating and my heart rate would shoot up.
The Supreme Court began by acknowledging that there was a balance to be made – according to the court “The more artistic protection is favoured, the more technological innovation may be discouraged; the administration of copyright law is an exercise in managing the trade-off.” There were strong arguments in favour of imposing indirect liability here, based on the vast number of infringing downloads and the impossibility of direct enforcement against the individual direct infringers.
There's but one word that springs to mind when I think of the remaining artwork of The Arduin Adventure: gratuitious.
In the Year 2525--Zager & Evans
The traditions of the Prophet tell us that any place on Earth is suitable for prayer — any place except anything blatantly inappropriate. Like a bathroom, sewage drain, or bar serving baby back ribs wrapped in bacon and sauteed in a nice brandy sauce (well even so, I know a NYC Muslim liquor store owner who prays in the back).
I cut some scrap papers to size and used re-positional tape to hold them in place while I
KNEAD on low speed for 4 minutes
Once you’ve made the inventory, store it off site for safe keeping. Online storage in the “cloud” might be the best place to insure you’ll always know where it is. Contact me for a free Home Inventory form; it’s my way of helping you be a better homeowner.
It was not immediately clear whether the men had attorneys. All of the suspects, ranging in age from 20 to 35, were expected to appear in federal court this afternoon.
Well thanks for popping by and checking out my children's work. I hope you can have as much fun helping your kids to create and play along too!!!
Congratulations, Lois, and thank you very much to everyone who took the time to comment and enter. In this big old virtual world, I appreciate each and every one of you who spends time with me here on my blog every day. You are the best!
Barnes and Chia are understood to have given full statements, admitting their involvement in kickbacks for concessions in the state and the MACC have told sources they drew up a dossier containing 40 charges against Musa, which was then blocked by his relative and close ally the Attorney General, Abdul Gani Patail.
Firstly I would like to thank everyone who entered Nicola's fabulous challenge last week. I think she will have a very difficult time to choose a winner from all the gorgeous entries.
Fermented on the cooler range with Fermentus US-04
I didn't disappear from my previously abandoned and very unorganized typing dashboard on purpose, see what happened was- my oldest was playing a serious game of "I'm gonna jump from here, to there", and mistook my laptop for a giant fluffy brown couch cushion. Aaaand the screen broke in half. So that sucked. ...but it didn't suck that bad, ya know?
I listened to a basic brewing radio podcast a while back where one of the brewers at New Belgium discussed the style of their beers. Well in their case the lack there of and I think that is great. Most of their beers have distinct belgian characteristics but its there own and that is the key in great craft brews.
The place is Huge.....I was able to make it through 1/3 before I lost all feeling in my feet....
1. On My Feet Again (Argent)
Yeah, back then Mary was called Angelina. But who cares? Writers change their minds, great bands make that possible, and in the final searing sax solo you became one with the less than lovely woman fretting about not being” that young anymore.”
If I was a 4-13 year old girl I would want this on the wall of my room. Heck. If I were not getting married and to share my room with my husband I would want this. A part of me wants this for my room! (He gets a mancave and I have a room too I just have not thought of a proper name for it as Lady Lair sounds a bit dirty...) I LOVE the vintage feel of this and of course the classic silhouette with extra feminine flairs. Can you imagine this in a black and white striped room? I'd probably find an ornate frame and put this down on a nice piece of canvas or something and just leave it framed in the room. Put shelves with white candles around it... just for extra fabulous-ness. I want this...
I’ve been thinking about iStart a Fan War, (which happens to precede iOMG in production) and I wanted to read a fanfic from a Seddie fan’s point of view.
Now, only six years later, Jiri Wehle looks quite a bit older, but as you listen to this recording, don't watch the video. Instead, imagine the scene I have described here-- the moving firelight, the ancient stone bridge, the illuminated castle on the hill and its reflected image, as if pixelated, scintillating on the surface of the Vltava River, the stone bishops, the cranking of the hurdy gurdy wheel.
4) For topping, add berries, sugar, and water to a saucepan. Bring to a boil over medium-high heat and cook about 4-5 minutes. Turn off heat and allow to cool slightly. Pour berry blend over cheesecake before placing cake in the fridge OR place berry topping in a separate bowl and chill until ready to eat, then allow people to top with berries, as desired.
- 55g / 2 oz / 1/4 cup of margarine , (or butter if not vegan room temperature)
1894-1962
I fought the fear for quite some time. So I just played, creating lots of lovely backgrounds, waiting in my journals and on my papers, waiting for me to decide if they would ever see any more action.
I was shocked. I haven't received flowers from him in years. Had he finally decided to give me a just because gift?
How lucky am I? The gods and goddesses at Algonquin Books set up a Bookclub with webcasts pairing uber-famous writers with we lesser mortals, and I was blessed enough to be paired with Anne Lamott. The webcast is here!
“Yes,” Hannah called out again, “I’ll get it out as soon as I can.”
At least, that's what I *hope* is going on.
The story of the lone right-wing crusader...Jackanory.
Sonic Youth 100 % US
Worse than Church architecture, has been the suppression of the Catholic spirit in everyday life. For us our religion is not to be discussed except among fellow Catholics or in complaint. Protestants in English speaking nations do not wear such a gag. They are freer to open religious conversations, to invite newly made friends to church with them, to speak of something God has done for them recently. This subtle but constant evangelization of ones social environment is perhaps the greatest treasure that our new converts bring with them. Only, these new converts will not be assimilated into a non evangelizing local parish community. Having their own church homes will allow them to continue to cultivate their evangelizing instincts. And, they will bring with them their hospitality instincts which we cradle Romans have little sense of.
I have been wanting to do this dish scrubbie ever since I first saw it ages ago. You can find the pattern HERE. Mine came out bigger because I used a larger scrubbie and had to make more sc's around the edge. But I actually like the fact that it's a little bigger. This is a great little gift item or even better in your OWN kitchen. A quick project with a practical use. :) Enjoy!
We had the Sat-Nav set for Cheddar.
Today my tulips bloomed and I finished a painting inspired by said tulips. Entitled, "Venus in Spring," it is one of a series that I am currently at work on. In addition to a full-size painting, each image is burned onto a screen to print from. The canvas is a Moleskine notebook, favorite of DaVinci and Hemingway. Each notebook is screen-printed with one of my Art Deco inspired illustrations (Grandpa Charlie and Venus among them) and then hand-painted. They are for purchase in my Etsy shop.
Seems Negi and Asuna are waving goodbye to everyone. I find it amusing how the entire cast, sans a few characters like Arika, the Black Lillies and Kagehisa, are all on the cover – even chibi Setsuna and the Slime Sisters!
and is called Brianna Banana
F: Yeah, yeah. After about a year.
Adams expressed love to his family and apologized to witnesses, including one of the women who survived the attack and relatives of the man who was killed.
E is for Every indulgence of its taste
If we never have the courage to share our story,
Since they rightly concluded that homosexuality clearly did not meet this two-pronged set of criteria as do actual psychiatric disorders such as alcoholism, bipolar disorder, schizophrenia, depression, et al., it was appropriately removed from the DSM. Had homosexuality been retained in the DSM, it would have stood out as a sore thumb as the only category not meeting the two-pronged standard set by the scientific committee for the revision of the whole DSM.
One who seeks to evangelise must identify himself with his audience. Jesus Christ identified Himself with the human race. This is clearly seen in Philippians 2:7,8. Referring to the Lord,
Do you ever feel like you’re looking through a mood darkly? Yeah, I know, I sort of stole that and tweaked it a little. I love tweaking. I’ve been in a place lately and it’s reflected in the music I’m listening to-over and over. So, since I’m going to have to start scheduling some posts ahead of time, I decided that maybe on Saturdays I’d do a playlist (very very brief playlist) of what I’ve been listening to during the week. This music is also reflective of my MC……
So last night I check my voice mail and see that a company that handles compound and specialty medications has called . Of course they were closed when I called back. I wondered and worried what they wanted. I called back this morning and spoke to a very nice lady. She went over my benefits with the insurance company and also the coverage for the medication. OUCH.
Hattie Brown from Backatown, they used to call her,"
So what is it that you are chewing on today as you go about your life ? What is it that is taking up your thinking time ? Is it the latest news headlines ? Something on the world stage? Something that is happening in your home ? your work ? your family? your friends? your neighbourhood ? what is it that has a hold of your thoughts,…is it something good, bad or indifferent.
We looked at each other and at the dark house we had just left.
Group 1 Conditioning
Fantastic entries with our wonderful sketch!! Great job everyone! Still a little low on the entries for sketch challenges..not sure why either cause they are my fav! Anyway, the ones we had were terrific! Our wonderful sponsor was non other than Digi Doodle Shop and they kindly donated a $10 voucher to the store.
I used the Create a Critter cricut cartridge.
Moderator: Aura Quezada (Mount Royal University)
Here is what I found:
Roll down till you come to the "V" of the petals.
Whenever anyone sees the proofs of What’s for Lunch?, my upcoming book on how schoolchildren eat around the world (not a huge focus group, I admit, since the book hasn’t been published yet, but significant enough), they always say they wish they lived in France.
Another time, I persuaded a twelve-year old boy from school to run away with me, and we sneaked off during lunch and stumbled through the woods to the highway. I will always remember the briars and vines and tree roots, and how weary my feet and legs felt. It became very cold as the evening progressed and the two of us were freezing. When we reached the highway, we stuck out our thumbs to hitchhike out of the area with no destination in mind. We made it as far as Atlanta, Georgia when an old redneck farmer with a Southern accent stopped in his old pickup truck. We climbed in the front seat of his truck and had only traveled a few miles when he suddenly turned off the highway, drove us down a long road into the dark woods, and raped me with his headlights shining through the sinister trees. That poor boy and I both expected to die. But the man drove us back to the interstate and left us there. I never was so happy to see the lights of a police car as I was that night, when the cops pulled over to pick us up and drove us to a runaway shelter. I did not tell anyone about the rape, so the man never was sought.
Sprinkle a tablespoon or so of sugar on the butter.
The people then, according to locals now, was worried more about ridding the church of the Spanish soldiers so they could attend church than the actual battle. The Americans, understanding the symbolic significance of the Spaniards surrendering to them sent a rescue party but was annihilated by the Katipuneros. The Spaniards in the Philippines preferred to surrender to the Filipinos than the Americans. This could be coincidence but in Baler and Iloilo, the last Filipino towns under Spanish rule, both were surrendered to Filipinos.
11. Have you ever written about a crush you had? If yes, please share the post/s.
He lost me.
I will illustrate a few of my favorite personal discoveries.
1) Grilled cheese: sandwiches, grilled, cheese, ingredients, bread, and cheddar.
I much prefer the Limited Liability Partnership. At least in this case the major players are actually subject to the consequences of their actions.
Several minutes later, he was breathing on his own and his blood pressure was normal.
Besides, the Supreme Court has also settled that regular service of any assistant engineer in degree quota will be counted only after he/she acquires the degree in engineering.
Here, for your dining and dancing pleasure, is the part of the CNN interview in which Rep. Boehner shows that too much instant tan spray can affect brain cells.
We should also be an Idea Economy providing places that inspire creativity, research, innovation and technological developments for next Steve Jobs, Einstein or J. K Rowling. These people all went through unconventional routes that led them to what they were most known for. In my writing group I remember one of the members saying ‘I wonder how many books are out there, sitting in draws because they didn’t feel it was good enough’. Too many of our dreams are crushed early because they are not obviously profitable to begin with, even if they proved to be later on after the fact. We need to cultivate human curiosity, experimentation and ingenuity once more.
Hmmm. Passion, success, contribution….gets ya thinking, huh?
Most people who love this book refer to the nostalgia it evokes, since they read it as a child. I, too, read it when I was a child. My copy was given to me for my 12th birthday. (Of course I never would have remembered that, but I have proof.) Unfortunately, it was given to me by someone I'd rather forget, so I don't have quite the same feeling of sweet reminiscence as you may have when you reread The Neverending Story.
Westmorland Ale at just 4.0% is brewed by Jennings, and is described as "a lovely golden amber ale with subtle hints of toffee and caramel. beautifully balanced by hoppy notes from the Fuggles, Goldings and Challenger hops." It's also got a rather attractive label, depicting sailing boats on one of the regions many lakes. A trifle on the weak side for my liking, but still eminently drinkable, and easy to recognise as coming from the Jennings stable.
On to WIWW….linking up again this week with Lindsey. Be sure to head over and check out the other links!
No more death sting
Not only do we practice self-hate, but there seems to be a rampant growth of mis-trust among females. I am astounded by how often I hear women brag about only having male friends, of not trusting other women. How sad is that? Not to have a female friend to spend time with, to talk to......don't kid yourself......men are wonderful.....but none of them will ever understand, bloat, chocolate, shoes or hot flashes!
I won't tell you what we 'talked' about, some secrets are mine to keep forever, but I did find out a lot of useful info about some of the children that were making my life difficult and that could be used for blackmail at the opportune moment.
It is modern version of a westerner’s point of view of what India is all about. It looks as if all the scrap of dirt is lifted and put together in one big bag. A gross injustice I would say.
It seemed odd to think that only thirty hours ago I had been sitting in a Starbucks having coffee. But then that man with the formidable mustache had sat down next to me.
for dinner tonight. Whatever sounds
3)
After that episode, her life takes a bizarre turn. She’s experiencing unexpected flashes of insight into people’s lives—people she’s never met before. Strangers frighten her with warnings about the approaching Shadows. And although Elise has never had a boyfriend, she suddenly finds herself torn between two handsome but very different young men: Abe, the charming bad boy whose affect on her both seduces and frightens her, and the mysterious Harlin, who’s new to town but with whom Elise feels an urgent, elemental connection—almost as if they are soul mates.
4. Master a new craft until you’ve deemed the living room safe enough to re-enter.
But that’s not the only kick life has delivered to me and mine.
I cannot afford
You probably already know how much work and time it will take to write an article. On average, a single 700-word article will take about two hours to compose from scratch. If your intention is to create a website with over 50 pages, then you can see how daunting and time-consuming the task of simply writing content will be. PLR articles will save you this time and effort.
Brandt and I are having dinner tomorrow night with your friend Rachel. Your boys will be staying with your brother this weekend - and I'm going to do whatever I need to do - to keep myself from driving down to see you. I know you need to rest - and having me bedside - holding your hand - playing with your hair - cracking jokes at the male nurses expense - probably isn't gonna help you much.
His trial is set to start October 1, 2012, exactly two years since a devastating blast that occurred less than a kilometer from the Eagles Square in Abuja where President Jonathan was attending Nigeria’s 50th anniversary.
We’ll say things like, “oh, we’re getting to know each other still,” or “Who that guy? Sure, we’ve been on a couple dates, but it’s nothing serious yet.” And if you’re stuck in 1999 and still thinking that Love Jones is how you should model a relationship, you might even say something like, “Oh we’re just kicking it.” But when anyone makes the mistake of jumping you two to the dating stage too soon – somehow you find a way to shut that down quickly.
Vince squared his little chubby legs, fixed his face into glare of pure ‘I am SO mad at you’ and peed all over my floor.
Oil and water do not mix just as theological novelties and the unerring, imputable, eternal Truths of the Catholic Faith.
“However, I am very pleased with these three days of testing,” continued Fernando. “The feeling I have after the test is a positive one. We have introduced a few small, and I stress that word, aerodynamic updates, that have produced the response we were expecting and that is the most positive news, which means I am confident for the future, in the short and the long term. It means that what we see in the factory in Maranello has now also been confirmed on track. Furthermore, we have worked on other areas, especially the tyres, doing short and long runs, on set-up and also on starts, given we were also trying out a new clutch.
I am reddened, raw and tender.
Please check out the dare blog to see what everyone has created.
I still enjoy Sublime’s 40oz. to Freedom album. Takes me back to high school, just like everyone wanting to get a piece of the 1t. Okay, well not really. Surprisingly, I wasn’t too successful with the ladies back then. Yes, yes, pick your jaws off the floor.
First) I quit Walmart a while ago. I now work at Village Inn. I absolutely love it. They treat their associates like gold, and the people there are so fun to work with!
Let’s recap real quickly:
Vital Secrets follows nicely after Solemn Vows. The next book in the series continues with the 1837 Rebellion in Lower Canada which should be as interesting as this one was. Historical novels provide an excellent way to reintroduce the reader to a time long ago.
"Don't sleep with a drip. Call your plumber."
The breaking wave and the muscle as it contracts obey the same law. Delicate line gathers the body’s total strength in a bold balance. Shall my soul meet so severe a curve, journeying on its way to form?
I've always loved scary stories, but until recently I was hesitant to label myself as a horror fan. The word 'horror' these days makes people think of slasher movies and the Saw franchise, and I'm not big on those at all. But horror, to me, conjures up a different image: a simple story told out loud in a dark, dark room.
Some will balk at such a stance and in truth I no longer care, for truth is truth and to veer from it is akin to lying, yet I would ask the open-minded reader to simply investigate for themselves the crafters of race-relations law, the hand behind communism and its leftist incarnation in western Europe, I would ask the reader to recognise the very hypocrisy of the settled Jewish community within this country, in that they advocate for Israel whilst thwarting any endeavour for we to regain our country. There will never be a day that I will advocate the merciless killing of Jews or any other non-European individuals or groups, yet I will not sink to my knees purely to placate a hoodwinked people or indeed, a now hoodwinked nationalist movement.
Now, having said that.
WHO EVER HEARD ABOUT MR. OBAMA’S STAFF’S CORRUPTION ,SHOULD THINK TWICE BEFORE VOTING TO REELECT MR.OBAMA.WHOEVER SAW HIM ON THE TALK SHOWS MUST THINK TWICE BEFORE VOTING TO MR. OBAMA.ARE YOU JOKING ME ,,THE PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATED ,HAS SO MUCH TIME TO WASTE INSTEAD OF TAKING CARE OF MORE IMPORTANT MATTERS.TERRORISTS ARE HAVING A VACATION ,TO PLAN THEIR NEXT ATTACK ON AMERICA OR ON THE WEST.MR. OBAMA WE DON’T BELIEVE IN THE CHANGES YOU CALLING FOR ANYMORE.REMEMBER THE DEAD WHO BECAME ALIVE IN 2008 AND VOTED FOR YOU THEY CAN’T VOTE ANY MORE.
82) It really pissed me off when "The Breakfast Club" came out, because I had red, curly hair, in a semi-bob just like Molly Ringwald did, and I DID NOT COPY HER, SHE COPIED ME, dammit. Fuck that pissed me off to have people thinking I copied her. That was probably why I started having it straightened and went blonde.
“You don’t say,” I replied. “Well, unfortunately I’ve got a prior engagement to attend a chimpanzee christening before going to the barber to get my arse-hairs trimmed.”
And YA lit is never, ever lukewarm or tepid in terms of voice—which is so driven by character, setting, and plot, and which defines each YA novel—that distinct, one-of-a-kind voice that speaks a book into existence, that prods and goads and compels a writer—me—to tell the story.
Vol. 1, No. 24, 18 February, 1859, p. 281.
If I have enough personal connection will I cease wanting to achieve fame? As for wealth I don’t care about it for its own sake, but would I still even want to do all the thousands of things I haven’t done yet that need money? Would I still want a grand piano, to travel, new underwear, Armani clothes?
He said that the respondent through a letter on January 2 informed that Taj limited had been declared successful bidder. The petitioner contended that the respondent failed to ensure transparency and declared the Taj limited as a successful bidder.
But speaking of the premiere I went to, it was Sherlock Holmes and it was great :)
they will wield paintbrushes and spoons.
We then drove a short distance to Buley Rockholes, which are a series of pools in the same creek that feeds Florence Falls. There were many people enjoying the small pools, and some kids were jumping into one of the deeper pools. We sat in one of the shallower pools and relaxed for a few minutes.
The Battle Of Athens: Fighting for Liberty, Restoring the Rule of Law
After the Atkins decision in 2002, Denkowski became the first choice for Texas prosecutors. He would ultimately testify in 29 cases—nearly two-thirds of such appeals in Texas to date. ...
As noted previously, everyone has different seizure triggers, and not everyone can avoid seizures just by making different choices. But many people with epilepsy do have that ability, and it’s those people in particular I am addressing here. I hope by describing Traci’s situation in detail, others may be able to reflect on their own seizure triggers and consider what they need to do to minimize their risk.
Debbi made visits to over 25 other outdoor education facilities in the United States. Visiting exemplary programs such as the Teton Science School in WY, Wolf Ridge in MN and Frost Valley in NY, provided a collective best practices model around facility design and program. Attending a Graduate Program Conference at the Teton Science School, discussions began with the University of Washington that confirmed a decision to offer a 10- month residential graduate program at IslandWood. Using the model of the research Closing the Achievement Gap, the graduate curriculum would focus on giving future educators the skills they needed to reach more children through an experiential, hands-on model of learning.
“Unjust laws exist; shall we be content to obey them, or shall we endeavor to amend them, and obey them until we have succeeded, or shall we transgress them at once?” Thoreau asked in his influential essay, ‘Civil Disobedience’.
The fact that my brain never stops working! I get my best ideas at night time! I could be so close to sleeping then something comes to mind that I have to write down..so I hop out of bed and have to write it down before I forget..
I’ve recently blogged about my fifth anniversary. It was the fifth time that my fiancée and I decided that there was no place we’d rather be than with each other. It’s very interesting that the day happened to be on a Friday on that day five years ago.
Discussion and Analysis
Cracks and reforms and bursts in the violet air
But I do think that it must happen MORE to me than to anyone else.....
3. I love ice cream
The pleasure is when you fight the wind and win.
Every day brings a tide of humanity to New York City. Many are tourists. Others come to stake out their claim for better opportunities. Some are swept here by serendipity. And every day the tide goes out here too, taking away many who have come here for any variety of reasons.
another satellite passes by
"My good friend Russell Redenbaugh puts the financial implications of all this in a nutshell: the likelihood of the Republicans gaining control of the House has put a floor under the market, while the odds of the Republicans winning the Senate define the upside."
Tomorrow will be the same, another 6 hours.
Looking at creatures of habit from a positive angle, habits do not only happen but can develop and be changed. Using empowerment to help people gain a deeper understanding of our habits can result in new habits for positive effect. If we understand what motivates and incentivises people to change their habits, good results can be achieved.
While I often say that "I have no connection to the farm" -- what I really mean, is that I did not grow up on a farm (nor did my father who couldn't have had a more urban upbringing living through the Great Depression and WWII in Detroit's "Motor City"). However, I come from a long line of "peasant" farmers (as my nana would say) -- who eeked out a living as shepherds in the hills of Intermesso in Abruzzo Italy.
This is the BEST PART!
big yes for cancelled uni project meetings.
I have never hated a TV personality with more passion than this man. Because of this man, people have stereotyped me as an ignorant American, but, honestly, I’ve met plenty of ignorant Canadians, including those who have no idea where and what Taiwan is and think it’s part of Thailand.
For a backdrop I used one of the atc masks that are spiderweb shaped. The door shrines are actually sized so that you can keep your atcs in them. But I just liked how the web looked behind her. Then I added in the gravestone cutouts to finish it off.
I also started reading Vaults of Power by a fellow attorney. The author has given me an extra copy so I thought this is a great place to start the giveaway. Since I am mailing this out I will make it international:
Much to many a metalhead's delight, one of the 90's best thrash acts returned like a bloody hellstorm last year with death and vengeance upon their teeth in the form of Dysτopiα, and in this mere blogger's opinion it was one of those triumphant comebacks which could have easily made my Top 11, but didn't due to how things ended up being ordered.
“People were really skeptical,” said Kokayi Kwa Jitahidi, a community organizer with the nonprofit Los Angeles Alliance for a New Economy. “People thought, ‘Another job fair?’”
Dear Query Shark:
Today we will finish the posts on Jacob and his encounter with God. Jacob in his encounter with God wrestled with God and it changed everything for him. It changed the direction of his life and even changed his name. In this post we will continue to look at Jacob and again if you are unfamiliar with him please read Genesis 31 and 32 – if you wish you can click here to read it. The minimum I think you should know about his encounter is in this paraphrase of the Scripture of Jacob wrestling with God:
Nice looking, interesting looking chickens.
Monday, Baseball Ross and I got to see Perci Garner really step up. The whole team seems to have begun to “gel”.
That’s not much of a drive to make in order to get a hot meal and real bed rest for a night or two, and maybe pick up some ammo. In addition, the Meherrin location has a much lower profile than the one in Red House.
JUSTICE SCALIA: I think it clearly --clearly would have been covered by -- by the test
Kiawah Island is just down the gaston south carolina attractions a road split in the gaston south carolina attractions. Battles raged across the gaston south carolina attractions and the gaston south carolina attractions to the gaston south carolina attractions and understand your basic legal rights. These rights come to you at first that these colleges are not as if you love golf, luxurious accommodations and a $10,000 in property damage coverage also when an accident or a mere 5.1 percent return on the gaston south carolina attractions a Bachelor of Art in Studio Art with concentrations in Ceramics/Sculpture, Digital Media, and Printmaking as well as South Carolina include Anderson, Aiken, Beaufort, Charleston, Florence, Georgetown, Greenwood, Hilton Head, Moncks Corner, Mount Pleasant, Myrtle Beach, Newberry, North Charleston, James Island, Isle of Palms, Folly Beach or Sullivans Island.
The effect of doing away with the glazing bars on the windows is to diminish another solid, integrated terrace.
As for the painting part - not too much time spent working, but this seems to be at a resolve - I will wait until it dries completely to make sure - things can change while the drying process takes it sweet time, but sometimes it stays as is.
The food was great, Deb did an excellent job hosting....The cake was wonderful, and I'm glad we didn't take home the remaining pieces, because I have no self control when it comes to cake.
I do not normally photograph weddings nor do I typically get hired to do engagement sessions, but was super excited when I received Laurie’s call to hire me for her engagement photos. She wanted something rustic and vintage, which is right up my alley and immediately my head was spinning with ideas! She wanted a downtown Nashville shoot and there is so many neat spots, nooks and corners there to get some great shots!
My therapist showed me his face and asked me what I saw. They only thing I saw was anger. Then he started reading my faced and when he told me I looked sad I started to smile.
But I’m no Occlumens, it’s true.
Garlic powder Pesto
The task force took nine years to complete its work and never publicly released its findings. Not the results of its case reviews of suspect lab work. Not the names of the defendants who were convicted as a result. And not the nature or scope of the forensic problems it found.
It's great to share your blog with everyone, but it's also fun just to look around. Even if you don't have a blog, you can find a wealth of great people willing to share their talents.
Moments of utter frustration broken by laughter.
As for my heroines—I give my female characters enough edge that I don’t really refer to them as heroines. Either they carry extreme emotional baggage that they ultimately find the courage to leave by the wayside, or they behave in decidedly un-feminine ways.
Yesterday my Mother-in-Law and I went to the 'artsy' district and wandered around for a bit. After going through a couple of galleries, and an awesome folk art shop, we headed to the Blue Star Brewing Company for lunch. It doesn't look like much from the outside, but I was pleasantly surprised when we walked in. Outside there is a small wooden patio area that had been beaten up by the sun, wind and rain. It was quite charming, although I can't imagine sitting out there this time of year for lunch...the ice in your drink would melt too quickly, and your food would NEVER cool down! But there were a couple of brave souls trying it out. (They gave me a funny look as I squated down to take a picture of the sign...)
In case you're confused, don't be. For it all makes perfect sense when you think that their business is: photographs and endoscopes, (and after their latest acquisitions) medical waste disposal. Now, look again at the Diagram above. Isn't that what you see??
This is a pretty tricky time for your sign. Many of you want to travel now and explore any kind of opportunity that broadens your horizons. You're hungry for adventure because you want more out of life! Nevertheless, this particular Mercury retrograde, which is certainly hovering around you for the next month, is taking place at the very top of your chart. In one way, this means all the little glitches and foolish inefficiency that you experience will probably be rather public! (Major groan.) This could be anything from a flat tire in rush-hour to misplaced important papers during a public speech. Or maybe the microphone won't work? Try to stay on top of things so you don't end up with egg on your face. (If you do -- ketchup helps.)
Today is 01.01.10. *Happy new year!*
For the past few weeks, after learning how to see auras, I have practiced religiously on a daily basis to see mine. When I finally learned how to soften my gaze (this is hard to do deliberately), I was able to see a white glow around my feet and also my fingers. This is not to be confused with the after image that you see if you stare at something long enough and then look elsewhere quickly. As I continued to practice, I started to see a little colour ~ right now it is a beautiful spring green. After seeing my aura, I started to work with my dog while she slept. Chelsea's is pure white. I tried as well with my daughter and saw a whitish blue haze around her.
Happy Drinking,
a sick reminiscent ..
For a year or so now my husband has been talking about getting a camper for our truck so that we can take our daughter camping. Both he and I grew up camping, I real camping in a tent and he light weight camping in a camper or trailer.
Time for a little bit of Five Question Friday y'all! Today is the unofficial first day of Spring Break for us in this county. The school board actually planned a teacher workday the Friday before Spring Break week starts. So we're starting today by having Little E miss today since his VPK does not follow school teacher workdays. I don't have much fun stuff planned for the kids today tho, since the hubs is working. Miss K and I are planning on pedicures though. Maybe Little E can stand it long enough while watching the iPad. Let's hope so!
"Sister Mallory Castle, You HAVE a LETTER!!!"
Betty confides to her therapist in The Wheel (S1, E13) in her first truly honest moment "I can't help but think that I'd be happy if my husband was faithful to me”. A particularly messy exposure regarding her husband’s infidelity with the wife of a comic, finally forces Betty to face the harsh reality regarding her marriage. Betty tells Helen, her divorced neighbor, in The Inheritance (S2, E10) that Don has moved out of the house. She is undecided about the future of the marriage and responds, "Sometimes I think I'll float away if Don isn't holding me down." Her divorce from Don Draper, when she learns the truth of her husband’s past, and her remarriage to Henry Francis, does nothing to alleviate her feelings of insecurity. Although she made no secret of her contempt for all things Ossining, she lives in the same house with her new husband that she once shared with Don. She has never been a bad parent, perhaps a little disengaged, but she is becoming increasingly irrational with Sally and Bobby. Henry's mother observes the children during a particularly stressful Thanksgiving in Public Relations (S4, E1) and tells her son "They are terrified of her". Betty responds in Tomorrowland (S4, Ep13) when Henry asks her why she fired Carla "I want a fresh start". However, she appears overwhelmed by the prospect of leaving her old life behind and lies down on Sally's unmade bed.
The following two reports should give an idea of the inefficiency of the camp hospitals: "Often people suffering from a minor ailment were violently removed from the tents of protesting mothers or family members to be taken to hospital. After a few days they were more often than not carried to the grave."
Now, I have to admit that I have a mild fear of spiders. That being said, I also have to admit that these scenes made me a bit jumpy.
“If you forgive people’s sins, they are forgiven, if you do not forgive them, they are not forgiven.”
But... as soon as he says it, he starts laughing.
...sometimes I just wish I could be myself on this blog - or at least more of myself than I am. I hold back. I don't share the good news as often as I would like because I don't want to jinx things, and I don't share the bad because I don't want people to read this blog and see something in the words that isn't actually there.
TICK!
Hamid has controlled Sarawak’s key resources, first as Chairman of the Sarawak Timber Industry Development Council (in charge of logging), then as Chairman of the SEB (controlling the electricity and dam programme).
“Quite right. You are not supposed to. If humans truly believed we existed, we would never get anything accomplished.”
Then back in Romans 1:16, he writes,
...This is 'Christmas Party Tilda' from the 2009 'So Jolly' collection...
Sodium 1,835.9 mg
Heaven favor the bold and bless the foolish…a small thought passed through her head–willing her legs to continue their ramped up activity as she continued to pick up speed at an impressive pace.
Brush a microwave safe plate with enough oil, arrange the spiced wedges in single layer,cook in high power for a minute, turn the wedges and cook again for 2minutes until the potatoes wedges turns crispy..
Next up will be the "stories" of heroes and daring rescues, no doubt.
No reliance on glass-half-empty conversation,
There's a blog or an article or something else to read. Someone's thoughts that I'll have never thought about before. There's therefore something to think about, too.
A breakdown in democracy:
The bill, although not bad in concept, is a miserable band-aid on the gaping wound that property taxes open on family budgets. And among the most vulnerable and often financially stressed households, those led by seniors are at the forefront.
Paper is from Joanna Sheens Daisy and Friends CD and was in my bit box. Dies are all Spellbinders. Sentiment is computer generated. Ribbon, button and twine from my stash. As I only had one piece of the aqua card I've cut the oval from the middle of the square and the circle from the middle of the oval!
Overall the meeting was really good. He listened and explained and gave us a lot of information to consider. He also gave us a few names of some other REs in our area in case we do decide to go the medical route and want to look into a new doctor. We got a lot of information in these two meetings.
If you’re like me…and I know you are…you have a lot of wine corks saved in your cupboards. The question being, what to do with all those reminders of lost wine bottles?
When you go shopping at a children's consignment sale, easiest if you bring something to carry your amazing finds in.What is your favorite shopping 'vessel'?
I want to share a few links to articles discussing the two sabbaths. These people get the point across better than I can but I will give a few points about this to make you think. I encourage you to read the articles from the links below and pray that God will reveal the truth to you as well.
In the ancient Biblical language Jesus uses the word “parakletos” to describe the work of the Holy Spirit. We often hear it translate it as ‘paraclete.’
#070 Darin Erstad (Angels)
Of course, it's also been fun to have the leg hiding in my office all year. During the spring, one of my interns was in my office when I had to take a call. At some point, while I was on the call, he noticed a toe sticking out from behind a file and tentatively pulled out the leg with a look of puzzlement on his face. It took everything I had not to bust up laughing on the phone, and then had to explain to the intern after that even "professionals" (as I am of course) are permitted to be silly / twisted / not quite right in the head.
For some reason, we very quickly forget about the “good” experiences and we concentrate on the “bad”. We tell ourselves we do this to PREVENT further “bad” experiences, but in reality, as Hale Dwoskin puts it, we are just carrying on our backs a huge baggage that has nothing of value in it. How silly. This “baggage” turns into a button that from time to time is pushed by outside circumstances/people in our lives, and it causes strong negative feelings. Eckhart Tolle calls it the “pain-body”. It’s that moment that someone in your life does something and you feel hurt because it reminds you of a past experience. That is the “x” that I have been talking about.
and even those who nobody respects
–One Hundred Years of Solitude, tr. Gregory Rabassa.
As I am far from being integrated, this will stay this way if or until that day arrives. I put Thale to rest in this post, but there are others. Also, by relieving Thale of her pain, I took on her pain. Her pain became mine. So no, the Healing Powers of God Party hasn’t taken place yet. And somehow I doubt there will be one defining moment where all my sorrows and pain are put to rest. My healing doesn’t work that way. I know what I have to do, and it will be difficult.
I'd never trade a moment of it! I am so looking forward to all of our days to come; each one special and precious.
CAPE TOWN - Treasury is estimating a R13bn under collection in tax revenue and this will require the government to temporarily increase its borrowings.
I had an idea for myself and for this site months and months ago, and I am just now getting around to fleshing it out. It's the change of weather. Makes me slow down which means I can focus on and do a lot of the things I've been wanting to do.
We have so much to be thankful for:
BBC home affairs correspondent Tom Symonds says the government hopes a softer approach will encourage asylum seekers not to fight their deportation.
Suit the action to the word, the word to the action.
In this example, publishers concerned about energy costs might tend to buy more efficient delivery trucks, and paper mills might seek production economies. But the bigger gains for the environment would come from focusing on the ultimate goal – getting news to people – and asking how it could be done with the lowest carbon emissions.
bedspread: pine cone hill
Sometime later Neruda wrote: “For me the sea is cleaner than the land. For that reason I decided to live in my home country in the coast, on Isla Negra, next to the foam of the great waves”. The house we never build ready. With time, new rooms and wings where added, so it became a sort of wooden labyrinth, with huge windows facing the sea.
3. While cauliflower is cooking, boil the remaining potatoes in salted water until just tender (about 5 mins for fresh potatoes). Add corn and cook for another 2 mins, until corn is tender. Drain.
4.) Leadership University - I debated whether or not to include this one. On the one hand, it has a bazillion great articles covering everything under the sun. On the other hand, it’s website format is from the stone age and thus, not very helpful. But, the good outweighs the bad in this case, so I’m including it.
4x Ghostly Flicker
Overall Height: a petite 5.5"
He really will say anything to get elected.
There’s nothing wrong with improving efficiency – but what working class people in South London need from our Labour Leaders is not just competent management – we need inspirational leadership in a fight against reactionary attacks upon our Welfare State.
“Samething” premiers RoxiRock’s smooth vocals and contemporary lyrical content, and is an example that young artists can spread a conscious message while still maintaining a progressive and refreshing sound. Produced by Jason “Jahson” Murphey and Robert “Musical Sniper” Wilson for Rootstime Production llc (2012).
Behold, all mighty and evil men shall be torn in pieces, with their limbs strewn about in the open fields and in the waste places!
Kazuo Hasegaw in Yukinojo Henge (Actor’s Revenge), 1935
Dilated pupils mean one of two things: pleasure or stress.
The next time that you feel that you are alone, closely look at the footprints in your path. You will probably find that they are not yours, for Jesus is carrying you when things are tough.
There are about 30 million Bangladeshi immigrants in India: ” ... we are staging an agitation against them. We demand that these immigrants should be identified and they should be deported from this country. Detect, delete, and deport, these are our three demands”, said Sunil Kumar, an activist.
We build walls around life's bruises. We neglect to share. We leave out the good because we don't want to brag and the bad because we don't want to whine. We bury Hard in the bottom dresser drawer, but in doing so, we miss opportunity. Opportunity to connect and often opportunity to comfort.
1 elapsed
Sapphira and the Slave Girl, Willa Cather (powerlessness)
The defense motion offers a sense of why Nifong, too, no longer wants to talk about DNA. The motion opens with a devastating summary of Meehan’s equally devastating December 15 testimony. It notes that, according to Meehan, “the best way to approach forensic DNA analysis of evidentiary items is first to determine who can be excluded as a source.” In this case, the three players targeted by Nifong, along with all other members of the 2006 Duke lacrosse team, would comprise the excluded group.
The collection was inspired by the idea of 'breathing'.
The second thing to understand, is the parts of a cartridge or shell (as I have reviewed in detail in other posts; but I'll go over them here again for clarity).
We actually got home on Saturday, but Patty rarely leaves the house on the weekends, and we didn't see her car move until Monday, so she probably wasn't even aware we were home. I suppose I should count myself lucky that she didn't bebop right over here any sooner, but she did show up last night. We had the sliding glass door open, but the screen door was closed and LOCKED, with the curtains closed. We were in the living room when the dog went over to the door and I heard, very clearly, someone trying to open that fucking screen door. Of course, I knew it was Chatty Patty, but it could have easily been fucking Dexter. The dog starts barking like crazy, and Tee goes over and picks him up, admonishing him for barking, and as she did, the curtain moved and I saw the bottom of Patty's legs. I asked Tee if someone was out there, in an incredulous voice, and she says, "I don't know." But I'm pretty sure she saw her too, so she sighs loudly and pulls back the curtain, and there stands Chatty Patty with a very sour look on her face.
I managed to take photos of my piles.
Genetic Factors
Of course, this type of behavior is extremely bad over the longer term. Why is it so bad? For an increasing number of people it is yet another example of an approach, reinforced by ongoing global financial disasters, that uses media manipulation and confidence boosting as a substitute for real solutions. It fails to punish bad behavior due to the need for collusion between the government and the offending corporations to construct the information campaign. It fails to construct real solutions since the facts are not known and the number of people able to address the problem is extremely limited. Also, since these people are the same people that caused the crisis, real solutions are avoided to prevent adverse publicity. Most importantly, it is yet another body blow to the nation-state and the global market system as legitimate organizational constructs.
Malacañang denied Monday the rumored breakup of President Aquino and Grace Lee. In fact, the couple reportedly went out on a date last Saturday evening in Makati City. Apparently, the rumor started when Aquino changed his Facebook profile status from ‘In a relationship” to “Hindi man lang naka-first base.”
Your novel is targeted for contemporary romance? I'm sorry, that makes me laugh out loud at the charming idea of all the novels on my bookshelves having parties, hooking up, and generally making merry while they await their chance to be read.
JT
You don’t have to worry too much if you get an odd potato chip that has a green spot, just be sure that you are not serving whole green potatoes to the family, particularly, kids and older people.
THE THREE DEGREES = DIRTY OLD MAN ..hahaha..enjoy the jazzy breezy song.
In an interview with Cable News Network, the Unit head of the Proceeds of Corruption Unit of London’s Metropolitan Police, Detective Chief Inspector Jonathan Benton, gave the hint that some measures would be applied against corrupt Nigerian politicians in the wake of the Ibori conviction.
In spring's sweet flowery month of May,
If there are little things that could bring joy for me, one of them is gotta be the smell of fresh-cut lemons in the kitchen, on Saturday morning when I don't have to rush things. The smell just can't be beaten by anything else, well maybe equally satisfying as the smell of fresh-sliced strawberries and peaches in the summer, but oh, it was so refreshing, nothing like lemon-scented dish soap or air freshener can ever compete with. The first thing that come up to my mind when it comes to lemons, it's Pierre Herme's lemon tart. It was almost exactly a year ago (one week shy) since I made this lemon tart here. Despite the not-so-pretty looking meringue decoration that I did, it tasted wonderful and I'm sure many of you agree with me that PH's lemon tart is indeed extraordinary.
in book form,
I am not really ready to decorate until after Thanksgiving..
Matt Grimmitt is one such potter. Although his great-great grandfather was a country potter, who worked at Winchcombe pottery, and taught a great deal to Micheal Cardew, Matt was no potter, he was at one time, a pro-skateboarder, then worked for a food distribution company.
I was never good at Maths! But I have come to understand the ideas of Paul Hiebert about sets – in relation to people and organisations! There are two kinds of sets – he suggests. Bounded sets – and centred sets. He wrote about this about 30 years ago! A bounded set is a group – an organisation that we belong to – because we’ve recognised that you have to cross some kind of line to get there. For example – if you join a club, you agree up front on the rules and expectations, including dress code and fees. Churches have traditionally been like this – you had to apply to be a member and read the expectations first (helpful) and then agree to abide by them.
Publisher: Hodder and Stoughton
Oh, and have I mentioned that oceans are salt water, whereas most pools aren’t?
Today I have an easy but delicious appetizer. You can fill the pinwheels with any ingredients that you like.
07. Message To Love
Spread into a greased 9" x 13" cake pan and bake at 350F for 30 minutes.
Right at 9:00 this morning, Judie and Dick Seeders (blog readers that live in Montgomery) showed up at my site to give me a personal driving tour of the area. I can’t believe that I didn’t get a picture of them, but since I wasn’t able to publish last night’s post after whittling it down to only two pictures, I guess I wouldn’t be able to show you their picture anyway. I don’t know why that post won’t publish since the signal was strong enough to post the night before. Who knows what’s up with that? I’m not even going to try to include any pictures tonight to see what happens.
Malick even acknowledges this weakness in a perhaps autobiographical scene where a child or his sibling finds a sheer nightgown in a neighbor's drawer and steals it. One might imagine he does something icky with the garment, but Malick has never cared about sex, onanistic or otherwise. His Texas is not the Texas of THE LAST PICTURE SHOW and its coming-of-age deviant cataloging or of GIANT and its lustful Deans. For Malick, women are symbols meant to glisten with beauty, particularly if they have long red hair that looks good in the setting sunlight (Chastain could be Sissy Spacek, after Martin Sheen's been sent up the river of life), and if they're wearing shimmering sheer nightgowns it's so the light can send a lace shadow over the lawn. Malick brooks no pornographic, only the Joycean aesthetic arrest, so the theft of the nightgown is the first guilty moment of a future cinematographer; the 'capturing' of a gorgeous ephemerality; the nailing of butterflies to celluloid, like Stan Brakhage. But without a film to bury the image in, there's no reliable 'container.' The kid notably tries first to bury the nightgown under some mud (too much like sending it to the editor) then decides to release it into the stream, into the flowing fleetingness; tje cinema he can't himself witness without a helicopter shot (and there are many); the night gown so ephemeral the only eye that can possess it is the fleeting eye of the all-seeing viewer, the 'god' eye. The little river/stream itself is something like a long band of film, and each nightgown tossed onto the waves a little baby Moses of possible meaning and interpretation, before it goes over the falls only to return in the next full rotation of the astral take-up reels in time for the nine PM showing.
So Pat got offered to guest post here. But that is not going to come due I fear. For Pat is too boring and would have you all snoring. He wanted to talk about taxes which would probably make you want to murder him with pitchforks and axes. So the cat will save the human once more and
I have written and erased this post many times in the last few weeks, it's not an easy one to write. The last few months feel a bit blurry and I am just now moving forward and feeling like Life does really go on. It may be enormously different, but it keeps going on.
The three secret stories are Mia’s near death:
I have learned a lot from being a small business owner. Doable Diapers was there to back up my husbands income when his employment was uncertain. It was there to give me something to do, and let me be creative with my website and blog. It gave me an outlet in something that I like and am knowledgeable about – cloth diapers. But now I have two small children, and they demand a lot of attention. Life in the City is harder {maybe more inconvenient would be a better choice of words} than I had imagined, and I can’t really expand my business out of my home any longer.
DCI Gailey added: "He went out of his way to help members of the community on a day-to-day basis. "There is no motive for the crime at present and it is absolutely pivotal to take this inquiry forward that I establish what the motive is. I'm not ruling anything out. I don't have a motive for this murder. I'm keeping an open mind as to what the motive is."
my husband is unhurt - which is a major plus with that little bitty car and the Large Deer grown in this here area;
4) there is no right way to scrapbook. these are your books and whether you use no embellishments or top notch supplies...your family will cherish them forever.
We have only to consider a few traits of God’s Love made flesh and our souls are touched by his generosity; they are set on fire and feel gently impelled to contrition for having been petty and selfish on so many occasions. Jesus does not mind lowering himself in order to raise us from our destitution to the dignity of being children of God and brothers of his. You and I, unlike him, often pride ourselves stupidly on the gifts and talents we have received, to the point of making them a pedestal from which to impose our will on others, as if the merits of our few relatively successful efforts derived from ourselves alone. ‘What do you have that you have not received from God? And if what you have, you have received, why do you boast as if you had not received it?’
‘John’ writes: ‘Because we are civvie private security and get paid well we are seen as mercenaries. So unlike when a soldier gets IEDd, when we get killed or injured nobody gives a s***.’
Jose Tabata, Pirates
A couple of stools that were originally ugly blue with tweed cushions
Sometimes, our nations water problem is not only the scarcity of water but also “too much” water during occasional floods. And during that time, having too much would cause “too little” water for people to drink.
Eventually, inevitably, there will be real changes advocated from this. But for now, it’s far more important to show that we, the people aren’t powerless. We can gather together, we can create a voice capable of shouting down the din of the corporate-political moneyed interests and the media that serves them. Once the people on a large scale understand that, we can bring about progress on our own, regardless of and in spite of the institutions that have controlled and pacified us for so long. Then real, effective, long-term change can occur.
Jen, you’re the first winner. An honour, and one you will want to carry out with gusto. Please use the badge freely on my blog, and go crazy on my readers’ comments. I will also expect your blog post published by Wednesday, at the latest. Get to it. Next winner will be crowned Thursday. You know the rules: best comment on Le Clown’s posts wins the Bigger and Better Dick in a Box.
Science Fiction and Fantasy is read by people of all walks of life, including many great minds - scientists and philosophers. It takes someone with an open mind to be unafraid to challenge what we know and to be prepared to explore the unknown. To start off with our world and extrapolate into the future until it doesn’t resemble anything we are familiar with yet still create a work of fiction that can touch us and make us consider the possibilities.
VII. FINAL REMARKS
Then, he got a second wind and started jumping again. While he squeeing about, I set the pole up on the barrel to a fairly big vertical. He jumped it from a long spot right out of stride in an economical fashion followed by a few more conservative distances. Then, he completely buried himself at the base of it and tried to get his front legs out of the way, but couldn't, knocking the rail down. I reset it to give him another shot if he wanted it. He came around and hit a deep spot again, but this time rocked back and cleared it with ample room in front and at least a foot and a half behind. !!!
This ghastly rom-com about a relationship between a bereaved self-help author and a lonely florist is told as a series of fatuous homilies about ‘recovery’. This entire list could have been composed of failed, foolish American studio romantic-comedies.
Here, I see the LAW showing the sins of others, while the Grace revealing our own sins which can lead us to repentance. I see the LAW thirsting to kill, while the GRACE striving to save.
I do not know this person, but nonetheless, was touched by the story. Go!
One of the biggest ego’s in music also tweeted a picture showing him shaking the hand of Maradona, with the added caption ‘Maradona shakes the hand of god.’ Phlease.
Way too cheap for what they are. I didn’t fully realize this until I got a player with a lot of equalization choices. Then I discovered that t…
of you, yet when the sun
Although I don't join Theme Thursday every week, I hope that I make every post I do put up worth reading. I'm really happy that today happens to be a perfect follow-up to the last one I participated in, which was about Food . . .
When the disciples heard this, they were greatly astonished and asked, "Who then can be saved?"
Proverbs 11:3 tells us that, “The integrity of the upright guides them. . . .” Character is the result of a moral compass that determines how we think and act. Intentional concern for the condition of that compass is also an important quality of character.
Security threat
They kept walking for almost a week, and finally came to a field with a house, they saw the house from a far and as they neared it, they saw smoke coming from the chimney. The last person they had seen was three days away, and so they wondered who these people in the house were. His little angel was in now better spirits after crying for most of two days. I think she was starting to go into shock, her young mind was trying to save her soul from the torture.
Hi to all the Cutie Pies this morning, you know who you are!
Phew. I think that's it. If anyone actually made it to the end of this post and has their own experiences to share, I would love to hear them. Particularly weddings in the South, I imagine they must be very different to what I've been to here in the East!
Good Evening my friends!
How incredibly cool.
However, it seems not to weight me down too much nor does it keep me sleepless. Why? Because when fears overcome me, I have always a broad shoulder to cry on and strong arms to support me. And a kind, steady voice to reassure me that everything is - and will be - fine. At last I have a man in my life that makes me feel safe, because he is just like me; believing in the same values and seeing life as an endless adventure, one that needs to be lived and savored. He never makes anything into a problem and he makes problems into nothing.
One of my friends', Angela, had a workshop for me a few months ago. This is her second workshop she's had for me (She's the Hostess with the Mostess!). And, now, her friend, Nichole is having a workshop the first part of August. THANKS GIRLS!!!
Hello, lovely blog family. I'm here today to bring you another Card A Day Blog inspiration. Our theme, this week, is 'Giving Thanks.' With Canada's Thanksgiving holiday right around the corner, and our US Thanksgiving not far behind, it seems an appropriate time just now to be making those cards.
We soon recognize that the crowd on the other side of the mirror is a society of men standing upfront and women in the background. While the men look worried, the women are faceless: they either turned their backs on us or wear black veils. All men take their jackets, ties and shoes off, and gather in two concentric circles on the right side of the stage, with the women clustering in a corner of the opposite side of the stage.
The five-page complaint, which was obtained by The Hill, accuses Issa of using his position as chairman of the House Oversight and Government Reform Committee to add to his multimillion-dollar fortune.
Yesterday I wrote about my bemusement over the crowd of ‘tweens that tends to congregate at my local Starbucks. I could not understand what draws them like moths to a slickly packaged caffeinated flame.
The inns of God where no man paid, that were the wall of the weak.
Beware the easy prognostications of "here come the Democrats" because one can look to Kentucky, Virginia, and Indianapolis and see a trend. And it’s not necessarily the trend that the Dems think they see, nor the trend the GOPers think they see.
Meanwhile Britain’s Telegraph newspaper reported on Saturday last that REO had put the BPS up for sale. Or at least a 50% stake in it, though the newspaper also reported that “REO is now also considering” a 100% bid with a future profit share. Presumably if the price was right an outright sale of the property might be on the cards. It might also be significant that REO seems to have been marketing a stake in the project for some time, and indeed generated interest according to the Telegraph, but that it is “now” willing to consider a more substantial transaction.
7. Beds Are Burning- Midnight Oil
God knew they were the same;
It really is properly excellent.
How would you describe the relationship between Winter and her sister, Lucy?
Led by the sharp edge of trained memory, Rel took up Rissad's trail and headed roughly North, into the sunless grey canyons amid the highest towers. Clearsight remained unforgiving, telling him in exacting detail which cracks in the walls that loomed over him would eventually bring their buildings down. Silence became the ally that steadied his nerves; surely a collapsing building would roar enough warning to let him get away.
I will announce the winner on Friday, March 23rd!
What do you think is the biggest misconception about colds?
I need to get back to work before I fall further behind. Here's a new awesome song that I am just going nuts over. I don't even know why, I just love it.
Sami Gayle posed for photographers on the black carpet at the American Express and Cinema Society-hosted premiere of her new film, Detachment, on Tuesday (March 13) at the Landmark Sunshine Cinema in NYC.
After school today i am going/went (depending on when you’re reading this) to sign up to the gym. My school is on the same grounds as the recreation center so me and my friends are joining together. I can’t tell you how it went as i haven’t been yet but soon i will give you an update!
We covered the cable industry for almost two decades, so we can clue you in that affiliate sales is one of the most important gigs at a cable network — and these executives are often among the highest-paid at a network.
So to all those bleeding hearts countries gleefully clapping their hands and laughing “Serves you right for Apartheid” (isolating yourself from black on white hate crimes); take note of who the perpetrators are in your cozy countries of unrest, riots, civil disobedience, murder, rape and robbery. I’ll put my money on it that it’s usually a black African…..
Mondo
Matins of Advent
the same thing happened when i discovered art. the feeling of inspiration gave me perspective, clarity, and the feeling of lightness. the cluttered house doesn't make me cringe as much anymore. i know what i want to be when i grow up, so to speak. it's ok when my social work job is tough - i have a nice balance between it and making art. i had a phone conversation with a friend today about her personal unearthing of the thing that is bringing her love and inspiration and i couldn't be happier for her. these things, these findings, are life changing, as simple as they may be. passion is everything.
My tool for this month is the Jenni Bowlin ticket border punch. I am going to show how to create that little row of tickets on the front of the card. It's pretty easy, you just punch each side of your strip, making sure to line things up. The trick is getting the right width of your strip, but I have it figure out that it's the little mark right before the 1 inch on my Fiskar's trimmer! Don't ask me "what" the dimension is...I am only good with 1/4, 1/2 and 3/4 marks!
The tour was mostly oil company propaganda. First the was a movie how they developed this oil field. Then he just drove us around the town showing the machinery and stuff. That Christmas tree thing that can close a well. He was throwing lots of numbers around and terms and stuff, but didn’t really show anything specific. Prudho Bay itself didn’t look much different from Deadhorse. I expected to really see some oil-producing stuff, that big machinery, the drills, the pipes and pumps working – more details basically. But all we got is just view of the buildings, from afar. There were a couple of lonely animals walking around. Some lost bull caribou, two arctic owls just sitting there (in different places). From the distance they looked mechanical as if made specially for the tourists. There were rumors that some polar bears were spotted in the area. That would be so exciting (!), even if we had to stay in the bus, but nothing happened. All we did is dip feet in the Arctic Ocean and went back. After the tour we just got some food for the road and started driving South to Fairbanks. As long as the van isn’t shut off for a while we were fine.
('snigger')
You saw me standing alone
I have been penalized in this endeavor because it has cost quite a lot of money. It is well worth it, however, because I know that once the aims and ideals of my new Lodge get out to the general public, a storm of interest will be created and folks throughout the land will flock to our banner, eager to join.
This walnut cake is made with spelt flour, which I love and has just the right amount of spice to give it flavor without being hot or too overpowering. There's a bit of orange zest in it and an orange syrup poured on top after it comes out of the oven. I much prefer cakes like this to the kind with frosting. I'm not a frosting hater, but normally I scrape most of it off because it's too much sugar for me. I feel like I could eat a piece of this for breakfast and not start the day off on a sugar high.
We've just had my godson and his older brother (one of Charlie's very bestest friends) over for a sleepover and right here, I have to tip my hat to ANYONE who has 3 boys. The sheer volume for one thing; and the vehemence. Anything and everything that could pose as a weapon was dragged into service against monsters and unsuspecting parental units. I mean, I love the Nerf guns but the frenzy to which the presence of one can raise a roomful of boys is, frankly, quite disturbing - particularly considering that these are really very little boys.
margarita evening never erodes
Low and behold, there were about a gazillion. I settled on one I found on allrecipes.com and decided to give it a go. None of them vary by much, but leave it to me to try the one that requires 3 packages of cream cheese rather than 2. I'm pretty sure I chose the right one.
- That’s novel, - he said. – If I’m your falcon what does that make you…my prey?
FG 1.012
The picture to go with this is one I have not yet taken.
President Obama can’t even take credit for getting Osama Bin Laden. All Obama did was carry out Bush’s plan. I have it on good authority, Limbaugh, Beck, Coulter, and other reliable sources, that President Bush could have captured Bin Laden, but he left the job for Obama because he wanted the “new guy to get a good start on things.” So even Obama’s supposed triumph was really Bush’s.
Increase speed to med-high/high and beat for about 5 minutes, just until the icing is glossy and stiff peaks form.
In the meantime, here are a few of my favourite Jonathan Adler colour intensified rooms.
Okay I need more paper like I need a hole in my head but since I already have 2 holes in my head I figured the 3rd's a charm! LOL I signed up to receive monthly Market Fresh Kits from Market Street Stamps. I never look at the preview of them except I accidentally saw the stamp for this month. I like to be surprised. I love to craft but I am colored challenged. I see cards and think OMG I love it but I would of never thought to put those colors together. So the kits come in handy. Everything is all in one perfect little package. I keep all my scraps in there and have them right next to my desk so I just pull it out.
So now my focus, at least for now, has turned to helping raise awareness and funds for Juvenile Diabetes. I am not sure how my stitching and how this blog are going to play into everything, but I am convinced God will show me a plan.
Mentioning three Old Testament personalities in this one verse; Cain the brother of Abel whom he killed and rejecting the way of God; Balaam who led the enemy of Israel to cause them to sin; and Korah who was a rebel along with Dathan and Abiram, against Moses and Aaron in the wilderness journey (Numbers 16). Still we see the need for discernment in the Body of Christ.
Did you ever see
The first sleep was the deep sleep you took after slaving for ten hours in the fields or, for the privileged class, after applying yourself to something completely dreadful like cross-stitch for an inordinate amount of time. After enjoying REM for a good five or so hours, you would awaken and have a restful period which would typically last over an hour. And what would folks do while awake in the middle of the night without artificial illumination? Oh, you know eat, chat with the neighbors, get frisky with someone of a different class…those sort of things. After which the desire to sleep would return and they would, covered in turkey bits, breast exposed, rest head upon pillow for a slightly lighter slumber.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees-F.
The Cooking Process:
Publisher: Simon Pulse UK
The Chronicles of the Black Company by Glen Cook
b) the total amount of yarn the shawl would need – a more abstract figure and only measured by means of a bit of algebra.
Laura, you are a truly wonderful woman, thank you for all that you have done and for getting it here on what was such a bad day for me!
No matter what you choose, it always seems like the grass is greener on the other side.
Now the kids are back in school I am going to try to be more regular in posting here on the blog and updating my website. I also have a business page on Facebook and have been better at posting pictures of new beads and beads I'm selling on ebay. I even have a couple sets of beads on a Facebook store page but I'll admit I'm not quite sure how that's going to work.
Four girls, who cannot be named for legal reasons, were allegedly given alcohol and drugs, and forced to have sex with some of the men.
This is a good clean look. You can add a bit of yourself to it with color for text, links, background edge and border. You can also upload your own image for the header background if you like.
It's already feeling a whole lot more peaceful in my soul.
A benefit for the New Mexico Committee of the National Museum of Women in the Arts, the exhibition and sale was organized to expand the notion of what a dress is and how it reflects the inner self of the wearer. The proceeds will help support the 25-year-old museum and the committee’s “Women to Watch” program, committee president Susan Berk said.
It’s a "misty, moisty morning" and the dogwoods seem to have appeared overnight, mingling with the redbud trees to make a glorious spring pageant. After Saturday’s rain I can smell the earth just begging for the tiny little tomato plants growing in the windowsill. Spring has sprung.
There have been (at least) two hindrances to the widespread adoption of FPGAs by scientific application developers: having to code in a hardware description language, such as Verilog (with its accompanying hardware-based programming model) and poor FPGA memory performance for random memory accesses. CHiMPS, our C-to-FPGA synthesis compiler, solves both problems with one memory architecture, the many-cache memory model.
black tank (under shirt): Old Navy
With World gold in his pocket, David Rudisha (KEN) went to Rieti in search of a shot at his own WR. While he came up just a hair short – 1:41.33, #5 all time – it was his 4th foray under 1:42.00 in the last two seasons. He now owns the #1, #2, #5 & #6 times in history. And the only marks better than today’s run were all WR’s at the time they were run.
"It's a predator?" Could it have survived in the First Realm this long? No, it was newly arrived, or it would have been on them already. Instead, its form seemed to ripple like a cat's flank as it moved, slowly. A single step forward?
Last year The Rock was the special guest host for WrestleMania. He decided that he had had enough of that Roody-Poo Candy Ass John Cena who gave him the Attitude Adjustment the night before and intervened in his title match against The Miz, giving Cena the Rock Bottom and allowing The Miz to retain his WWE Championship. The next night The Rock and John Cena agreed to meet a year later, in The Rock’s hometown of Miami, Florida.
Thank you for emailing me about your Hermes handbag. I had an extra $3,000 lying around and it was getting really difficult to carry. Now I can rid myself of that problem by purchasing your handbag. If you had not emailed me, I don’t know what I would’ve done. Drowned myself in the bathtub while using all those benjamins as wash cloths, I suppose.
Hmm, back to the here and now. I did miss Mass. I really didn't see a way around that. I had things to do, could do them, did do them, but couldn't have slept anyway. I can let one goal go in order to make a primary goal. And I might still be able to make Mass tomorrow, depending on what is decided and who needs what no matter what is decided about this and that. I know, I KNOW, but I only have one 'me' and that one isn't so great. You can't make a catfish fry dinner with only carrots, broccoli, and peanuts, 'kay? Yeah, a bit more picking and grinning, then to polishing shoes (and boots while I'm at it), laundry, soaking pots and pans (for now), maybe a meal later if I have time, cleaning toilets, and a pre-shower after that so tomorrow's shower will see me to more of the pick dust out of my hair, maybe all of it. Even with a baseball cap on my bean I must get a pound of dirt in my hair when I do that!
Perhaps it is a sign of new beginnings, as there are some shoots of hope peeking through.
So it was that on a bright but overcast day in July, myself and my partner-cum-photographer Rachel were welcomed by Anthony Price and his wife Ann to the charming cottage in which they have lived together for fifty-seven years, in the countryside just outside Oxford. It was an idyllic setting: as we drank a glass of Chilean white in the conservatory prior to the interview (Price is a keen wine connoisseur, and would have "gone into wine" had he had the opportunity), three butterflies floated around inside the glass and brick structure, attracted by the warmth. ("We're supposed to count them, aren't we?" remarked Ann, referring to David Attenborough's appeal on that morning's television news for viewers to catalogue butterflies due to their decline.) Later, a green woodpecker would hop across the lawn while blue tits played in the hedges. (Like a sizable percentage of the population of the UK, Mr. and Mrs. Price are Countryfile devotees.) Following our chat, Price served a delicious luncheon of salmon and salad – featuring potatoes harvested from his son's garden – over which repast he regaled us with further literary tales.
Prepare the pancake batter: In a medium bowl, whisk together the flour, baking powder and salt. Whisk in the milk, egg and oil, just until the batter is moistened. Or prepare a pancake mix. Set aside.
I do not know the facts of this particular case. Before making a judgment if the community standard was breached, I would need to know specific clinical details.
Still early in the year, so my thoughts are fuzzy, but every year, I try to read 2-3 mysteries by foreign (and that means no Canadian or British also) authors and a couple of small press books.
"After speeding up the lift hill, riders are treated to twists, turns, airtime hills, a "Twisted Horseshoe Roll" maneuver and a 400-foot-long speed launch through a dark tunnel."
2 Corinthians 10:5 We destroy arguments and every lofty opinion raised against the knowledge of God, and take every thought captive to obey Christ
“Come with me,” I said. “You’ll be all right now.”What follows is Timothy trying to determine where the blood—for there isn’t a mark on the little girl—came from, and why the child was fleeing the scene. Her name is Bird Daly and she tells a series of fantastical lies that ultimately lead to the truth. I hope very much, therefore, that page sixty-nine meets with approval from readers. It’s what The Gods of Gotham is all about.Learn more about the book and author at Lyndsay Faye's website.
(4) Cash liquidity equal to the purchase price of the shares is provided to the family of the deceased owner.
So coming back to our opening scene above from Porridge – if you are a buyer and you believe that prices will drop by 13.4% in 2011 and 14.4% in 2012 and your seller also believes that to be the case, then like Norman Stanley Fletcher you might go through the motions of having a negotiation but the terminal price is going to be a price which reflects the drop in prices over the next two years. And if there is no such bargain, the market will freeze and there will be practically no transactions whilst we all wait for the bottom, and if we do have that type of distorting behaviour – waiting for two years for prices to hit the bottom – there is the risk that prices might drop even further if there is a supply glut during a short period. So it probably is the case that Governor Honohan has given buyers a green light to demand a 30% discount on current values and if you’re not getting a 30% discount, then as a buyer you are being done. It’s worth remembering that there is an adverse scenario which projects a 32% decline in the next two years.
The last two nights we have had hot water for showers. This is such a luxury and really appreciated. The elephants had leant on our hot water system while we were away so we had to do some running repairs - but now - yeehah - boiling hot water out of the tap!! Cold showers on winter days are no fun at all.
24And the people said to Joshua, We will be the servants of the Lord our God, and we will give ear to his voice.
Folding Chair
“Nobody knows more about the perfect gift than Oprah. Except for you! How thoughtful. Thank you!”
The very creative Kristen called me the other day requesting a special order. Ron, her father had just passed away and she asked me to recreate in cookie his 1965 Mustang for favors at the funeral. She made a tag to put on the cookies that explained the history of the car and how it was passed to Ron by his father and restored by him.
our memories will spill
i have crazy blog envy. or maybe blogger envy. idk. all i know is that i can't get myself to do it (the bloggy blogging) man!
Final Note: A great place to spend an hour enjoying beer and new knowledge. If you have the time and a car, this is a great place to go.
“We will be considering the existing models currently in use by local authorities as well as more innovative mechanisms to gain capital funding for infrastructure projects.
Guys, I'm scared. I'm scared because I've let a book in. Well, technically, I let it in last summer, but this feeling isn't going away. I'm so very much in love with this book. As I prepare myself to go on sub again, I'm trying to steel up my heart and emotionally detach like I always do, but I can't do it. I also can't ward off the lovely dreams that drift into my mind and heart when I'm not paying attention.
Now we’ve just got to get everything completed in time…
But can we say the same of this nation which is proudly hanging on to the trumpeted claim that it is at the doorsteps of 2020 – that magical year when Malaysia would be blaring to the world that it has arrived at the doorstep of the developed league of nations.
And there's too much to be done.
I wish I had a neat price breakdown for this project, but since we already owned a number of components, I had to estimate based on the Lowe's website. With the numbers of shelves, brackets, supports, drawers, laundry bins, and rods, my best price guess is about $350. I'd say about half of that was spent when we had the components from our previous house and the other half was spent for this do-over. The drawers weren't cheap... $27 (each) for the medium and $40 (each) for the large. The hampers with shelf and brackets (as a kit) were $50. We highly customized this (which of course added to the cost), to fit our preferences and the space given, but if you wanted to spend quite a bit less and don't need something quite as built up, it looks like you can get kits from less than $100 to less than $200. Oh yeah, I didn't count the cost of the various storage bins that I already owned, but you can get Sterilite bins for about $4 each at Dollar General.
Celebration of Hope 2010 is the annual fundraiser for The Salvation Army Women’s Auxiliary and will feature a silent auction, a full lunch and a special concert by Dillingham. Anita Bryant is the Mistress of Ceremonies.
6. Wind It and wire
She’s so big! This morning I left her in the young toddler room as the normal caregiver for her room wasn’t in yet. She was quite excited too! She did the happy kicky feet thing as I strapped her in. And that was without any food in front of her too!
And.....my principal asked me to help decorate the meeting room for the morning breakfast and luncheon. So I've had a few projects to work on for that. Did I take pictures? Of course not! But I did bring the lunch menu board home and got a pic of that so you can get an idea of some of the things I made.
- Fountain Square Pilsner
After all, you want to remain relevant, don't you?
Today Papercraft Star opened another challenge! This week your challenge is to include a bell or ornament somewhere on your project, and they have provided us with this beautiful photo as inspiration. (photos are always use if you choose)
Ultimately, the reason not to text and drive is because it could very well kill you as well as anyone else in your car and anyone else sharing the road with you. Texting while driving is a completely selfish act, seriously. You think you are in control and you think things can’t happen to you, but that is the farthest thing from the truth.
A few things still remain.
Black Tea made um, er, sexy? I can't think of a better
In the end I served this up with some tea when we had visitors - it went down a treat :)
Hope you have enjoyed the photo`s !! Sorry but blogger is playing tricks with me and changing the photographs around a bit !!
And here's another example of how the two are different. I received two thank you cards (one from each) in the mail the other day.
I've been reading The Bell Jar. Whenever I get to the part where Esther visits Buddy in the sanatorium I think about Eric L. I met Eric in a hospital. I was reading Rimbaud's A Season in Hell. I had a friend in the hospital who was an oboist for the Philharmonic and he told me that it was perhaps cliche, to read Rimbaud in the psych ward. I knew this but I couldn't help it. Anyway I think cliche was the wrong word. I was translating it. A final project for my French class. Eric was Unipolar. This is how he introduced himself. He looked like Jerry Seinfeld. I think there was something comforting about a Unipolar Jerry Seinfeld. He made me laugh. Plus I hated television. Friends was always on the television. I sort of felt like it was permanently on in the 90s. Friends made everything worse. I don't know if I can explain this to you. But Eric somehow understood how Friends (I keep wanting to add an article, like my ESL students: "The Friends"!) bothered me in a very particular way. He teased me about it and that somehow made it better. And then one day he kissed me. And then we snuck into his room, while his roommate was off having shocks. I think we had sex, or started to, until a nurse caught us. I think it was very exciting, actually.
I start pining after fresh green veggies first: kale, of course, spinach, chard, lettuce, brussels sprouts, broccoli and cilantro. After that, I ache for hummus. I dream about chickpeas when I’m on Asian soil, wondering where they are. Today, on a run, my mind trailed down this road: “If I live in Asia someday, could I make hummus from scratch? Do they sell chickpeas? Dry or canned? I could probably eat canned chickpeas if I have to. I wonder how many pounds of dried chickpeas I could bring in my suitcase with me. I wonder how long they’d last me.”
My father remembers a candy jar up on a shelf at his grandmother's house. My mother remembered the dark at the top of the stairs in her childhood home. I remember the carved lions that were the feet of my grandma's sofa. If I could go back in time, I'd photograph them all.
horror trembling.
Our lives have become insanely busy. Again. As usual, I suppose.
Now mix the wet ingredients into the dry. Mix well and set aside for 1 hour.
More than just a cozy, snuggly and comforting pillow with a humanoid shape, the Hugvie has a pocket where the user can slide in the mobile phone and talk with friends and family while hugging the pillow.
Checked and photographed as well. Our well-being's not risked.
4.) Stress-- this blog is starting to stress me out and that is the last thing I need. I don't want to worry about what I'll write about or when I'll find time to write. When I come back I want a plan and I want a passion for it.
What I lacked in quantity, I made up for in quality.
Pumped full of fear
A few days later, Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong announced in Parliament of his intention to call for a by-election in Hougang, but has not decided on the date.
-There is a secret stash of binkies and treats in your purse
It will take me a while to process all that this week has meant to me intellectually, emotionally, and even spiritually. I have slept better, have had fewer bouts with IBS (yes, ladies and germs, sometimes your Pine Curtain Refugee gets sudden, explosive diarrhea brought on by stress. Deal with it. I have to.), have been more inspired by and engaged in life than I have in how long, I can't remember. But the biggest feeling I've had all week is peace. Peacefulness that can only be achieved when your primary duties of each day involve writing, talking about writing, listening to people talk about the craft of writing, reading, listening to people read, and writing down lists of books and writers you want and need to read. That, my friends, is a version of heaven that perhaps few can understand. The only thing that would've made this heavenly vision complete would've been to have my family and pets with me, some really good Tex-Mex at arm's length, and maybe not so much cigarette smoking.
One thing that made a difference for me was the fact I had major responsibilities and had to continue as if I were still alive. When we pretend something is so for long enough, it becomes so and after quite a long while, I found myself coming to life again.
See previous IPBiz post:
We know from the beginning that Josh has been stabbed, the day after accidentally knifing his old friend Ranj. No spoilers in telling you that. The story unwinds quickly in alternating chapters of third person narrative flashback interleaved with even shorter italicised chapters showing Josh's present rapidly-changing situation. (So there are similarities to Anthony McGowan's book). But - and here IS a spoiler - the ending does validate the title, though Strachan gives us some hope at the very end too.
If you are in the area, stop by and see me!
Plus, as I’ve contended, the Nets (and other NBA teams) report tickets distributed, not gate count, which means that the percentage “filled” is lower than reported attendance.
"Suspended!" My interest peaked. "For name calling?"
1 ending
Jill: Why? I thought they liked me.
But three other members submitted a separate proposal of six provinces. They argued that the majority proposal had ignored economic viability. The minority report connected hills and plains, giving more provinces access to the India border; and it stood against preferential rights and right to self-determination.
Tryndamere: Motion seconded and expanded. All in favour?
Friday we decided to brave the Subway and head to Central Park. I was pretty proud of us for handling the Subway as well as we did. It wasn't perfectly executed, which was my fault, but we made it to our destination :) I didn't realize just how HUGE Central Park is. My feet probably hurt the worst after this day, but it was beyond worth it. We walked and walked and walked through Central Park. We went to the Guggenheim Museum which was nearby, deciding against the Metropolitan on this go around.
the framed in part above the eave will be covered in cedar shingles to match the front of our house. the big opening in the front will be all doors (right, mom?). i can't remember if its going to be a huge slider or french doors.
We also have Tucher Pilsener; Dunkel and Weiss... Take your pick!
During the session, we played five games altogether and throughout the games, he had to sit crossed- legged on the floor, facing me. I was in charge and had the say on who goes first, which car he should pick, etc. The rule was to take turns when playing and if he doesn't play properly he will need to sit on the chair. That's a time-out.
This first picture is standing at the entry the computer desk you see is where for right now I have my sewing machine and books with ideas I would like to try also some old scrapbooks.the desk was giving to us and I bought the sewing machine at a yard sale for $10.00 my husband many years ago bought me a new machine just like this one but the bobbin housing kept jumping and the stitch would be loose.So when I saw this at a yard sale I jumped on it works great.
This morning, here in our home, Jay was reading the newspaper and I was writing. The radio was on and without introduction the opening strains of a song came on. I automatically put down my pen and stood up at full attention. Jay looked up at me with a question in his eyes. I responded, “It’s ‘La Internationale’ stand up!”
None of us live in a vacuum. Almost everything we do affects someone else in some way. Early this morning, my good friend, Diana, texted me and simply said, “I love you and I’m praying for you today.” Later in the day, I was extremely grateful for her prayers because of the mistakes I’d made. Even though I’ll tell her how much I appreciate her text and why it meant a lot to me, she probably won’t be able to imagine what an encouragement her prayers were to me.
November 21
*15 tracks later*
A fifty year old white old man is on life support after a near fatal beating. Police have arrested two black teens. The attack occurred near the community where the Trayvon Martin self-defense shooting took place.
Sorry I haven't gotten much posting done this week. My computer caught a virus and I spent the majority of Monday and Tuesday trying to deal with getting my computer back. It was horrible the malware took my computer hostage and wouldn't let go. It gave quite a struggle. Thank goodness in the end with some help I won out and am now hopefully 100% cured.
We were talking about Jermaine and when she pressed me to tell her what he did for me, I told her that he made me feel important. When I met him and we started dating, it was like the popular guy choosing the smart girl. He was handsome and sexy and had an air of confidence around him that I couldn't have even began to fake. He was gorgeous and well liked. Everywhere we went, people paid attention. He was well known in town and we got a lot of special treatment because of it.
13300 Longwood Trace
On its face, The Scarlet Empress seems like a more common kind of story: a tragedy of overreach. Think of Citizen Kane, The Great Gatsby, or (from a certain perspective) Paradise Lost: stories of overweening protagonists who gain the world and lose their souls. And it's a period drama about royalty, with all the possibilities for lavish sets and costumes that affords. Those lavish costumes are going to be worn by none other than Marlena Dietrich, at the height of her powers:
My question to y'all who have kids is, how the HELL did you do it? I am in awe of each and every one of you, honestly I am.
1/4 tsp pepper-(IMP* the pepper gives it the real mush soup flavor)
skirt drops
So I have bent over backwards to work with the Republicans to try to come up with a formulation that doesn’t require them to vote sometime in the next month to increase taxes. What I’ve said is to identify a revenue package that makes sense, that is commensurate with the sacrifices we’re asking other people to make, and then I’m happy to work with you to figure out how else we might do it.
13. Apprenticeships: For on the job training for your older children, why don't you consider apprenticeships? If you have a student who is very interested in law or in mechanics, find a trusted worker in that area and see if your child can volunteer time (often doing menial jobs) for the opportunity to observe what a person in that field does on a day to day basis. Depending on the field, your student may be given more responsibility over time, and eventually paid for their assistance. Or your student may realize that the chose field is not for him. Either way, you come out ahead and so do they.
Today Kristen is sharing with us some items we might find in a garage sale of her teenage years. Welcome Kristen!
silly things
Well, I hear sometimes that he’s the biggest gold bug out there. (2)
Merengue, Robert Abigail (featuring DJ Rebel)
I think if men want to understand women and connect better, they should take up dance lessons like traditional Ballroom type dance. When I was in London while ago, I met this beautiful Eastern European girl who had grew up in the streets of Argentina. She was a profound Tango dancer and she took me to a Tango. Watching her and other women dance with the men made me delighted and opened up my eyes with passion. “I saw they were not contained, their eyes were connected to each others by the touch of the souls. The beauty of men taking up the women’s hand… there were no force, the relax of bodies were merging with the natures energy.
Definitely never going to be so open to people setting me up in future, that shit is embarrassing!
Yet for the period of roughly 1914 to 1989, a period during which the world was continually either fighting or preparing for world wars, anarchism went into something of an eclipse for precisely that reason: To seem “realistic”, in such violent times, a political movement had to be capable of organising armies, navies and ballistic missile systems, and that was one thing at which Marxists could often excel. But everyone recognised that anarchists – rather to their credit – would never be able to pull it off. It was only after 1989, when the age of great war mobilisations seemed to have ended, that a global revolutionary movement based on anarchist principles – the global justice movement – promptly reappeared.
I have some photos e videos from FP3 and Qualifying, but no broadband Internet so I’ll upload them later.
They may wear no earthly crown, but a crown of glory, unseen by men, rests even here upon their heads.
However, I like to discuss this topic with other people. I've tried to get to the bottom of why people my age do these things. Why go to a party and get drunk? I've never seen the excitement in that idea. Most people came to the same conclusion: it's just fun. It's an escape. It's something different; it's simply something to do. It can also be a release; a way to let loose.
Note: Use only organic pressed oils, preferably olive oil. This soup is very filling, so no sides are necessary. If you desire add Italian bread (with no eggs or milk in the ingredients for Vegans).
1 Roedelius* - Johanneslust 4:58
What do you think of the new look?!!!
Betsy and I debated covering some of the roses and other flowers, but we knew we couldn’t begin to cover everything. So we crossed our fingers and decided to hope the weather man was wrong.
To finish:
Most of the family before the reception.
A final warning. Part 36 offers do not behave like other offers in contract law: they cannot be withdrawn without leave during the first 21 days. Then they remain open until withdrawn by notice SERVED on the other party – which means that they are not revoked by a counter offer; or after a reasonable time; or even by rejection of the offer. So only make the offer if you know it can stay in place for 21 days, and keep it under review and withdraw it if it ceases to be appropriate (unless the CPR 36.14 benefits of keeping it in place still outweigh any change in circumstances)".A consolidated list of the first 20 PCC Pages can be found here.
running and jumping and doing her silly-little excited dog shake.
7) Continue to pan-fry the dumpling till the flour solution dries up. Carefully tilt the side of the dumplings to check if the bottom has turned golden brown.
“We ain’t gonna use that metric crap.” Ok, some people talk a little more dignified. I was the one that said that.
And whereas I am all for the evolution of language, and, as I mentioned above, flexibility in a language is wonderful, the ubiquitous replacement of "have" by "of" is a disgrace. There is no way it should be considered acceptable. Because "of" and "have" are two completely different words, with different meanings and different uses. "Of" can never replace "have."
It seems that communication between POD publishers is predominantly defined by email as the primary link between author and publisher. There are a few who use telephone once a ‘bond of interest’ has been established between parties. I applaud those POD publishers. So much can be addressed more easily from one human to another. While I can understand traditional publishers using both the medium of author agents and email as the primary source of communication due to submission volumes, I cannot comprehend the practice with POD publishers. We authors are paying you publishers for a service! If my pipes at home start leaking, would I put up with my local plumber only doing email! Good, clear, concise and mannerly communication is the core of any service industry.
Escape Plan Laarg Avatar – 4/3
in pieces
If you could do anything from this list *right now* what would it be?
I know, I know -
*Today we sang "I Need Thee Every Hour" at church. Has a lot of meaning right now.
by a Knight of Malta and is 51% owned by the Jesuits, as reported by
p.s. i think nelli and nico need a play date :)
Today, I received a handwritten letter from my “father” that twisted things my husband did and/or said during their visit into more than they really were. My husband has many issues, but my mother takes those and balloons them into more than they are. Bottom line, the message of the letter was that my parents are disowning me until I am no longer with my husband.
It’s kind of cool living here on the equator. Every day is equinox. The only seasonal differences have to do with the amount of rainfall and where the Sun rises and sets against the sky.
Let's have a look:
269 - Lamar Johnson
Hope your weekend is amazeballs!
Theatre producer Naomi Campbell, visual artist Osvaldo Ramirez Castillo, dancer and choreographer Yvonne Chartrand, media artist Diane Morin, interdisciplinary artist Nadine Sures, composer Paul Steenhuisen and writer Duncan Thornton are the winners of the 2011 Victor Martyn Lynch‑Staunton Awards administered by the Canada Council for the Arts.
Don’t be surprised at extremely different dreams, sleep cycles or daily occurrences outside of your previous concept of “normalcy”. We’re entering a new vibrational age. The cool thing is the information you need to substantiate these new awakenings are bursting out and at your fingertips right now.
I might even end up putting white on the rest of the drawers, I haven't decided yet.
Jack nodded.
The calendar is FULL of gardening information, photographs, useful planting guides and important gardening dates. This is THE BEST stocking stuffer, hostess gift, gift for a neighbor or fellow gardener that you will find in Polk County.
Combine all of the ingredients in a food processor and pulse until it is to your liking, add some water if you wish to smooth it out, refrigerate and then serve on top of vegetables, rice or bread.
Sintrapav, or the Union of Heavy Construction Industry Workers, told Dow Jones Newswires that all construction employees stopped work as of Monday, while support staff such as health and food services are working with limited staff. The strikers have yet to meet with representatives of Norte Energia, the group building the dam, according to Sintrapav’s office in Altamira, where Belo Monte is being built.
In Korea, their rice cakes are very similar to the Chinese plain ones. I think many of you will recognise 'ddukbokki' cooked in a chilli sauce? Korean's New Year is the same as Chinese, they also have auspicious rice cake recipe like this rice cake soup.
"Joe is a good man," one native tells me. "But he doesn't live in the real world."
Individually and collectively, human development is being arrested at the adolescent stage.
We acknowledged at the outset that the manuscript would be much longer than the typical manuscript published by behavioral science journals. As we prepared our first draft of the manuscript we realized we had a lot of valuable information but we thought the length was going to be an issue. When we submitted the manuscript to JABS, the editor and the referees were favorable toward it but made excellent suggestions to improve it, like wanting more information, which we already had but did not include in the original submission. We realized this was going to result in an even longer manuscript than we submitted originally, but incorporated this information nevertheless. In addition, the editor and reviewers made several very helpful points that allowed us to expand our discussion of the conceptual implications of our findings. They also made several practical suggestions that helped us reformat the manner in which we presented our data so that it is now clearer and more “user-friendly”.
Might it say, “you’re always welcome!”
1 You have been raised up with Christ. So think about things that are in heaven. That is where Christ is. He is sitting at God’s right hand. 2 Think about things that are in heaven. Don’t think about things that are on earth.
And Amy Goodman on Democracy Now! (September 23) included this amongst the radio program’s news headlines: “For the third straight year, Ahmadinejad sent delegates to the exits after questioning the Nazi Holocaust.”
BOO! HISS! STFU!
‘The Country Wife‘ has a main plot and a sub plot. The former is centered on a gentleman named Horner, who pretends to be an eunuch so that he can gain the trust of the husbands who would then allow their wives to spend time with him. A rich middle class man, Sir Jasper Fidget, falls for this ruse and allows him to enjoy the company of his wife, Lady Fidget and daughter, Miss Dainty Fidget. He also falls for a town gentleman’s wife, Margery Pinchwife when he sees her in the theater. Her husband, Mr. Pinchwife only married her because he could not keep a ‘whore’ to himself and felt that the country wife would not cheat on him because of her innocence and naivete. Yet he is wholly jealous of her and keeps her restricted and even locked up so that she won’t cheat on him. Margery is thus the titular character of the play. The play then goes on as to how Horner makes a ‘cuckold’ of all the husbands because of his stratagem. This is interspersed with the sub plot that basically deals with Harcourt and Alithea’s (Mr. Pinchwife’s sister) love. The two plots are in stark contrast to each other. The former is all about cheating on one’s wives and husbands and the latter extolls true love. In the end, it is Harcourt and Alithea’s relationship that is a right example of how love should be treated.
Random words generated by creativitygames.net.
And speaking of which, tomorrow night at 7:30 at the Founder’s Room at Galen Center, I’ll be speaking on leadership and ethics (stop laughing), the blog, my life, bears, bachelor, football and even some lazer tag. Admission is free but super limited at this point. Register HERE and show up. I will answer all questions in the Q&A afterwords. I am not writing a speech, it’s going to be stream of consciousness just like the blog. Hope to see you.
Yes, that is the same girl. Draya or “DrayaFace” (they don’t call her face for nothing) said on the VH1 that she makes her money off her looks. She is very pretty but check her out without makeup and she’s a pretty normal looking girl. She’s pretty, just not the extravagant beauty you see on magazine covers.
Michelle Malkin is a New York Post columnist. This column originally appeared in the New York Post on August 31.
~Charlie Brown
It was hot and pretty humid this evening, but I went running anyway! I was happy I forced myself! I wanted to go to the battlefield for four miles, but there was a chance of thunderstorms, and it seems like it always storms every time there’s a chance, so I decided to stay close to home and run through my neighborhood instead just to be on the safe side.
Do they even talk about the blood of Jesus Christ?
Krylon Artist Sprays and Adhesives with an approximate retail value of $70.
I asked my friend at work how she liked the booming site. “It’s a great way to collect everything you want to do or try or buy, or cook. But it’s depressing. I’ll never make that stuff.”
I play Luke, a young drug addict that Shay (played by Hannah Mangan Lawrence) encounters in her first few hours in ‘The Cross’. They meet in difficult, tense circumstances and it’s a moment of ironic tenderness in a harsh environment.
Gain true insight
Stamps: Nature's Nest, Inspired by Nature
*There are different methods of soapmaking, among them, these three:
Do you not know that in a race all the runners run, but only one receives the prize? So run that you may obtain it. – 1Co 9:24 ESV
During prosecution, the Examiner rejected the independent claims as obvious over the book "Using Microsoft Project 98" in view of a U.S. patent to Song. The Examiner relied on the Microsoft Project book for everything except "plurality of developmental lines." The Examiner then alleged that Song disclosed defining checkpoints for "components or developmental lines" during project execution. The Examiner further alleged that the motivation to combine was the book's teaching of "organizing a project activity or task list into phases."
John Chipura, 39, New York, N.Y.
Came visiting next day.
New interdisciplinary research on the Built Behavior and Health is being conducted by teams of urban planners, architects, developers, social and health scientists, economists and others, and is funded by the federal government. The findings from this research reveal significant relationships between the design of the built environment and multiple health and social outcomes, including obesity, asthma, mental illness, cognitive functioning, educational attainment, and all-cause mortality. Further, we are beginning to understand how to strengthen “social capital”, or the fundamental sense of “community”, at the same time. How we design our future community, then, will undeniably affect our well-being. Moreover– when input from residents, stakeholders, and cultural groups is considered in community design and redesign, results are even more beneficial. Collaborative events, called “charrettes”, are increasingly common and involve a series of design-input-revision sequences that seek diverse perspectives– even from the children who live in a community– about what is most needed.
I was paranoid that she was actually sick. I stayed awake, watching her, listening for the tell tale signs of innerds about to become out-erds.
Section I -- ADORATION
I moved forward and circled around the spot where I had last seen the skunk (not wanting to walk into his direct path, but also curious about where he was headed). As I came up over the rise, I spotted him again, moving away from me....with only his tail up above the height of the grass. He stopped intermittently to sniff at something in the ground, but eventually headed straight for a large den opening at the base of an old dying oak tree on-site. This is a spot my advanced ecology students had deployed a camera on previously, and there has been all manner of critter hanging out nearby (see here for photos of the den prior to the skunk moving in, and here for pictures taken from the camera hung above the den opening). I watched him give one final shake and then disappear into the root system. That's the last I saw of him.
The reality hurt. Sigh… There you are.
Into the bowl of a KitchenAid mixer, blend 8 oz softened cream cheese, powdered sugar (see below), and Baileys Irish Cream (4 tablespoons). I began with 2 cups of powdered sugar and kept adding it bit by bit until the icing reached the proper spreading consistency. As Rachael Ray says, "Eyeball it."
The third installment (a blaster) is coming soon.
It was the idea that you could have your soul sucked out of you via a kiss that caught my attention with this one. It seemed so tantalisingly good! The story completely lived up to the fabulousness behind the concept. My emotions were pulled this way and that as I lived through the torment of being soulless right along with Sam. Rowen’s style was so good that I could feel the desire to feed, to drain others of their souls as it battled with both Sam’s and my sensibilities of right and wrong. Add Sam’s best friend Carly to the mix with relationship issues of her own and you’ve got the perfect recipe for a wonderful best friend relationship to build these teens’ lives from.
1378 W Grand Ave at Noble St. (entrance on Noble)
I: NO I want to walk!
The An American Girl: McKenna Shoots for the Stars™ Blu-ray™ Combo Pack delivers the film in perfect hi-def picture and perfect hi-def sound. The Blu-ray™ Combo Pack also includes UltraViolet™, a DVD, and a Digital Copy of the film – so consumers can truly enjoy the movie anytime, anywhere, on the device of their choice! UltraViolet™ is the revolutionary new way for consumers to collect movies and TV shows and put them in the cloud. From there, they can download and stream instantly to computers, tablets and smartphones. In addition, consumers can redeem a Digital Copy of the film from a variety of retail partners, who offer many viewing options including iTunes®, iPad®, iPhone®, iPod™ touch, Android, connected televisions, Blu-ray player apps and more!
Tonight I am going to try to create a couple of freebies and/or a new TpT unit so be on the lookout early next week. Hope everyone is having a great weekend!!
Real history underpins the most fantastical elements of One Hundred Years of Solitude. Macondo, the novel’s setting, is a fictionalisation of García Márquez’s hometown of Aracataca, Colombia. The 32 civil wars between the Liberals and the Conservatives are inspired by 19th-century Colombian politics. The gringo banana company’s slaughter of protesting workers bears close relation to the Colombian government’s 1928 massacre of striking United Fruit employees. Such references to the historical record are processed by the Third World consciousness of García Márquez into richer allegories and metaphors for the Third World experience as a whole. For example, the banana company subplot is an extrapolation of an actual event in Colombian history into a more general comment on real-life Latin American struggles such as the Cuban and Mexican revolutions. Similarly, the corrupt tyrant José Arcadio who takes “forcible possession of the best plots of land around” and misappropriates funds to buy “Viennese furniture” reminds us of actual generalissimo dictators in both Latin America and elsewhere in the Third World.
It is easy to find excuses in life for everything that goes wrong. If there is one thing I am self critical about over anything else is being personally accountable for my actions. If you can learn to be accountable and stay positive you will notice that you feel better about yourself and when you remove the excuses you give yourself a real opportunity to get out of your own way and find a way to preserver. We always look for someone else to blame for our personal shortcomings and sometimes even develop a victim mentality thinking that someone is out to get us.
1. Collaboration between designers and businesses should be encouraged, as well as close cooperation with employment development associations and investors in innovation
22. Plots Before The Eyes
“Following the tragic death of Hayley, police officers and staff were involved in minimising inappropriate, speculative or inaccurate reporting, working with the family to try to limit the impact of constant harassment of the family by the media, and reassuring the local community”
I think my skirt is going to be less full than the one I used as a guide but I can imagine it with some leggings and boots and looking pretty cute. I didn't have my niece's measurements but I went off of some general guidelines that I found online. Fingers crossed that it fits!
Bake at 180ºC for about 50 minutes or until a skewer inserted into the middle comes out clean.
How do you get your ideas? Do you use real events in your novels and if so, can you describe one? I draw from my travels, adventures, and people I meet when I plot books. For example in The Summer My Life Began, the surfing scene is very close to my own first time surfing. In my spy series, The Specialists, I got my fight scenes and training scenes from my own MMA experiences.
PFTs measure two main areas which I have googled for you all!
I hope you enjoyed the Christmas tree inspiration from my favorite local boutique. Which theme inspired you the most?
Hello? Helloooo.....
"Well," I answered, "remember Cam was born AFTER you came home from China. We have the pictures of you holding him in the hospital."
go with
And yet the influential analysis of Hume asserted that a statement about causality is nothing but a statement about constant conjunction (Hume, 1777). In a modified form this account is still widely accepted among philosophers (e.g. Reichenbach, 1951). There are, of course, many ways of stating the case which do require us to acknowledge that the goal the psychologist appears to have when he says he only wants to predict behaviour is in fact more modest than the goal of finding the causes of behaviour. Nonetheless, it seems at least possible that the classical Humean attack upon 'necessary connection' as a feature of causation is one of the reasons for our reluctance to talk about causes. Some clarification of what talk about causation entails therefore seems timely -- doubly so, because work in psychology itself has enabled a fuller account than has heretofore been possible.
After running an insulting newspaper advert calling the citizens who opposed him “snakes in the cane field”, Matthew Kerins went home to New Jersey like the plucked chicken he was: older and wiser but still missing two million U.S. tail feathers.
or past terrors
Ticket to Ride became a single in April of 1965 and was from the band’s 10th North American release, Help! The lyrics were primarily written by Lennon, though it was officially credited to Lennon/McCartney. There was dispute surrounding McCartney’s actual contribution from Lennon, with McCartney saying he wrote more of the song than Lennon had stated.
On claims that PAS has digressed from its struggle to set up an Islamic country by advocating a welfare state, he said, “PAS abides by its constitution by curbing anything that deviates from Islam.”
yaj jñātvā mokṣyase ’śubhāt
What dangers face them in the sky, where far from earth they might not rest,
to complete the 2009 budgets.
bad poetry, written some time last week. and here’s the thing, though: i no longer am confused. i guess taking oneself out of the equation sometimes solves … safe to say, a lot of things.
This had some bitterness to it, along with a lot of floral aspects; a good dose of violet reminded me a little of a Camp David, but, after the sweet floral notes subside, a dry, earthy bitterness appears until the finish. Very unusual and one I’d like to try again for a fuller inspection.
Cherry- Provides attractive flowers in spring and delicious fruit in early summer.
The opening of Scream is without a doubt one of the most iconic scenes in horror. It's a sequence that embodies and to a large extent makes up for, much of the series. It does so by running directly counter to much of what the series does as a whole.
For example, Williams had been working with a large property owner in Berea to address an overpopulation issue near one of the owner’s buildings.
Which is when the four of us got the entire red team to start chanting RED. RED. RED. RED. RED. until poor little green team's chanting just slowly dwindled from GREEN. GREEN. GREEN. into, "um, green....ahem coughcough, nevermind guys, let's just give it up."
When I say repair, I mean A repair B job, while B repair C job and C repair D job, and D repair E job, and E is gone to a better job or retired rich to Timbuktu, and D is a new guy. Something like that, a merry go round. ( go back to para 2). When ever will these repair done with result is to be seen. By the way, new innovation and creativity is need, when are we going to we start. sigh!!
I remember many things...
Next up for the nursery...adding wall decor above this dresser! Hopefully I can work on most of that project without causing too much stress on my back. I started my 8 month of pregnancy today...time is a tickin'!
Yes, I know it was only supposed to be three but I got such a tremendous amount of page hits for this post and only 6 dared to comment so I decided to declare them all winners. So, congrats Ladies. Please email your address to Juliecross1 (at) live (dot) com and thanks so much for entering! Also, don't forget to include a first and last name with your mailing address.
Maternity clothes? No, but some things are a little snug.
I am indeed in simple words quite anti social. It has always been difficult for me to talk, to get involved with the pupils around me. I have always defended myself by saying and thinking that it is because of my parents who never allowed me much to make friends or to engage and be a part of the groups. But, that time has gone and I can’t do anything in that regard but one thing that I must do is to try and become social today ; after all it is never too late.
2011.84
Here's Larry and Matthew. It's nice that Larry's work is 7 - 10 minutes away so that he can sneak over for programs occasionally.
I started making cards and scrapbooking in the late 1990s
Second Officer Lightoller, I discovered in the morning, was on board. He and some of the crew were trying to launch this boat before the Titanic sank. They were unsuccessful, but she floated off the deck covered with people, all of whom were shortly after washed off. Lightoller himself was washed off and sucked up against one of the ventilator grills. He had a terrific struggle but finally again was able to reach the boat.
Gird your loins cause here it comes.
The good news is that by Monday morning I was feeling much better - and ready to get back into the kitchen! Because I looooove the smell of fresh baked bread, because I'm a sucker for peanut butter and jelly sandwiches, and because it was Monday and just seemed like the right thing to do, I made a loaf of American style sandwich bread.
This I’m curious about. I’m from the midwest, and I’m living and teaching in Fort Wayne, and I’m real curious about what you think of as regional writing. In some interview you mentioned how you’re interested in both southern-ness and in music (saying in the PW interview that the book’s theme could be identified as “The South’s history and music”). Can you talk more about that at all?
Part 1. Fixed penalty notices – the battle ground of the public.
As horrible of an idea as this sounds, in my efforts to keep my mind off Paul I have been taking a chance a mistakes. One of those consisted of seeing my ex-boyfriend for the first time since we broke up about a year ago.
The Long-Shining Waters by Danielle Sosin
Have you seen the movie "Hope Floats" by Sandra Bullock? It got me thinking about it recently- starting over and feeling like there's no reason to.
Day 190 – January 28, 2012
1. Prepare a steamer and set aside. Alternatively, prepare a baking pan and a wire rack and preheat oven to 350°F.
The machine was facing a set of glass doors which looked out across a fancy, shmancy LA hotel plaza and over the hedges, between some buildings, I could see into the distance.
She never had a friend
To each of you, the leaders of Al Qaeda’s Jihad within Great Britain who are reading my words, you can now clearly see the beginning of the response to your Jihad against the innocence within my homeland Great Britain and like I say, the response has only just begun!
It's funny how sometimes someone passing through your life can affect you.
and sometimes an odd scrap of news –
"My name is Joni Wilson, I am the sole designer of Inktegrity's images. Inktegrity was started out of my love for card making; my designs are fun for all ages and can be resized to fit your crafting needs. All of my images are inspired by upcoming holidays, everyday life, and friends' requests. Please visit the store site at: Inktegrity and browse through the different categories. Happy crafting to you, thank you for creating with Inktegrity!"
Human existence is one of guilt. Every single day we are told not to do this, not to do that, don't eat this, don't drink that, and don’t smoke this, basically because everything that is pleasurable in this world is in fact bad for you. So wouldn’t it be nice if heaven took away all of these boundaries and you could just live the way you wanted too? As long as you weren’t hurting anyone else what is the problem in shooting up heroin whilst face first in a six foot pizza while a midget shoves vibrating dildos up your bumhole? (This is, of course, just an example, not my own personal heaven. Ahem).
“I wanted to show solidarity with the protesters in New York,” said Dennis Murphy, a first-time demonstrator. “I think it’s an important movement, probably the most important expression of civil dissent in probably 40 years, at least.”
The Tardis stopped.
Flybe, Europe’s largest regional carrier, says it has removed the charge as part of “A fair, open and transparent approach to sales and service policies”.
Ten feet...
But thank you for all your positive comments, it gave me the courage to be wildly and happily overdressed!
1957: Ants die.
Too many people -- particularly so-called "rightwing" politicians -- have tried (and failed) to combine all White Afrikaans-speaking South Africans into a homogenous group forgetting that the gulf is far too wide and deep to accomplish this sort of social engineering in a short space of time. We have to remember that the Anglo war against the Boer Nation happened only 100 years ago and lots of suffering occurred in those hundred years. And where it counts -- in the hearts of the true-blue Boer -- this suffering will be remembered for quite a while longer. As for Nationhood, we have to acknowledge that language does not make a Nation, but rather soil, a shared history, and blood.
I don’t think I’ve magically created this party here, but I do think it continues because of the character I’ve created, the intent with which I write, and the reality that those who are here understand that I will “DO NO HARM”. I also won’t really tolerate doing harm to others. I think on some level, my readers must understand that about me. I think on some level, you all must be the same. Am I right?
“That’s when his eyelids flickers and he looked at me. I couldn’t believe it,” Dwina reported.
像个可爱的傻瓜
parents, saying “You shouldn’t stand outside like that, a stranger is
Some parents choose to defend their choices with logic, as opposed to emotion. This often takes the form of presenting a logical argument about why they made their choices and the benefits the choices have for the children. Examples are usually given, such as "well, look at what my child does; obviously it is working." I used to be a fan of this approach, but lately have come up a bit short because I don't like using my child's performance, behavior, aptitude, attitude, or anything else to justify my choices. Assessing my child in order to defend a choice, and then communicating that assessment to others as a justification in an attempt to win an argument, seems a bit disingenuous to me, if not downright degrading for my child. I see little difference between this and subjecting them to, for example, any other performance assessments or grading systems.
The article stated: "Jesuits have played leading roles in Nicaragua's Sandinista
I'm going places in this life
Pick up a pencil, and make an unplanned mark; a movement straight from your body.
What Actress Would Play Her In A Movie: Jennifer Lawrence
Let's get over ourselves, OK? I don't know if it's just me or if there really is suddenly a lot of ageist stuff everywhere, stuff about old people needing to get out of the way and make room for The Next Generation. I read a bunch of comments on an Advanced Style video, and there were some really weirdly hostile ones about old people. So you can't find a job and are having to live back home with your parents, and instead of blaming it on the technology that made hundreds of thousands of jobs obsolete or on corporate greed that outsourced untold numbers of jobs in order to save money, you decide it's easier to blame Old People who selfishly won't just quit working already? Are you kidding me? Never mind that a bunch of them lost pretty much everything in the crash, including their retirement fund, making the retirement they'd been looking forward to for so long about as likely as fully-funded public health care that includes a full range of contraceptive choices for any woman of reproductive age?
I haven’t posted a video or anything since a while too, but I have to say that this blog doesn’t pay my bills yet, so you guys have to understand.
that not be…weird?
2) Tori Amos
Michael L. Bocchino, 45, New York, N.Y.
I have no idea what time it was when Sid and Jen finally called it, but they did have to get back to their neighborhoods. For Rick and I, we were already home. So why not cap of the evening with one more drink at Grant & Green? How could we not? It’s a tradition.
“As committee chairmen, Cabinet secretaries, the head of Medicare and health officials see these really high costs, they are more interested in knowing, ‘what policy knob can I turn to stop this hemorrhage?’” said Michael O’Grady of the National Opinion Research Center, co-author of a new report for the Campaign to End Obesity, which brings together representatives from business, academia and the public health community to work with policymakers on the issue.
Week 6 - February 5 - February 11, 2012:
The coalition has a vast number of problems to contend with, and in this context it could be all too easy for the threat of Islamic extremism to get swept under the carpet. What's worse is that the new government could be tempted to do what so many people seem to do nowadays when they don't have an answer to a problem: condemn those who won't let you forget about it.
Average American citizen can see we’re developing a massive underclass of illegal, Third World, uneducated poor that have become our ‘indentured servants'. They won’t remain down on the farm for long. They are literally overrunning California, Arizona and Texas by sheer numbers.
Well I know that I promised I would post a couple of weeks ago, but I was too lazy that weekend - which seems to be a recurring theme in this household these days. I know that you guys have been wondering where I have been and how everything has been. Short story everything is going really well and I think I am afraid to talk about it because I am always afraid the bottom is going to fall out again. So here is my update....
I hate the whole music world as it relates to me. I don't belong here, dammit.
But…why wouldn’t you learn the tools you need to give yourself the best chance you can? Why wouldn’t you learn how to communicate better or learn how to deal with conflict with your spouse or learn what the unique dynamics of a stepfamily are? Then you will be ready for success!
Antonio Gramsci (1891-1937), Marxist intellectual and politician, “believed that it was necessary first to delegitimize the dominant belief systems of the predominant groups and to create a “counter-hegemony” (i.e., a new system of values for the subordinate groups) before the marginalized could be empowered. Moreover, because hegemonic values permeate all spheres of civil society — schools, churches, the media, voluntary associations — civil society itself, he argued, is the great battleground in the struggle for hegemony, the “war of position.” From this point, too, followed a corollary for which Gramsci should be known (and which is echoed in the feminist slogan) — that all life is “political.” Thus, private life, the work place, religion, philosophy, art, and literature, and civil society, in general, are contested battlegrounds in the struggle to achieve societal transformation.” This, according to Fonte, “is the very core of the Gramscian-Hegelian world view — group-based morality, or the idea that what is moral is what serves the interests of “oppressed” or “marginalized” ethnic, racial, and gender groups.” “The concept of ‘internalized oppression’ is the same as the Hegelian-Marxist notion of ‘false consciousness,’ in which people in the subordinate groups ‘internalize’(and thus accept) the values and ways of thinking of their oppressors in the dominant groups.” “This is classic Hegelian-Marxist thinking — actions (including free speech) that ‘objectively’ harm people in a subordinate class are unjust (and should be outlawed).”
cultures pushes us to compete, but
Would you defend yourself as the Apostle Paul did in Jerusalem? Today we are looking at the first verse of Acts 22.
You bet I am: these resources are depleting whilst international demand increases. Not a formula for smooth politics or a smooth future.
112The shrines all trembl'd, and the lamps grew pale:
is an experience by itself. It is so quiet and so dark in the deep woods. It would be no
Ballerina pumps, my everyday walking, stay-at-home.. anywhere goes shoes in black....These pumps work with pretty much anything that might come out of the wardrobe. My favourite brand...Repettos....(My little secret with ballet flats is to re-heel and re-sole them after buying with non-slip material....this makes them safer to wear and ensures that they last longer.) I would also add an addendum here (sorry Vogue Paris) and include a pair of Converse as an 'essential' essential...Dressed down and practical these are one pair of shoes I never leave home without....
To kill any weed or bacteria on the plants,I just use a solution of soap with water or ash with water.
I bet she would have cried, and even sniffed, if she tasted,
So I did.
I think a lot of families have a guy like that. I have been that guy, and I don't mean before unschooling. Up until a couple years ago, I was going into work every day and then arriving home to whatever state the house was in. My unschooling readers—especially the working parents among my unschooling readers, and doubly especially my mom who occasionally drops by my house—can understand what it's like to walk into an unschooling house at some random moment. To the untrained eye, it's chaotic. To the trained eye—meaning the eye of a person like me who knows that life and learning are messy...
The idea is that a project uploads its crowdfunding campaigns to the SoLoCo website in a few easy steps. They then have 60 days in which to fundraise, with a heavy focus on social media. Projects reaching their target keep all the money, while those who don’t, keep the money raised and can use it to apply for match funding.
Throughout the movie, everyone sings, but Michel Legrand modeled the score around patterns of everyday conversation.
were not sympathetic to the bicycler. I ran off the road twice. I
Next, a letter in the mail arrived from Optus, apologising very nicely, and cancelling the debt without admitting any liability. Wonderful! I just wanted to get on with my life. I don't care where the mix-up happened, I was just glad it was over.
Throne of the Crescent Moon is based on Arab/Muslim history and culture – as contrasted with Fantasy Medieval Europe, which is the usual fantasy setting. So the characters Ahmed is talking about here are the fantasy world analogues of Arabs/Muslims, and the world itself is a fantasy version of Arabic/Islamic settings. As a Muslim woman, I would dispute the assertion that “women’s power is most obviously wielded via intermediary men.” And to answer the question: yes, there is a problem if your story about Arab/Muslim women doesn’t pass the Bechdel test.
Josh moved next door when he was eight, and he’s now seventeen. He wants to design and build motorcycles for a living (he has already built one), but he’s planning to go to college too, and his grades are good enough for a scholarship. Since he’s skilled with tools, enjoys detail, is undaunted by complexity, and has the maturity to see a job through, I would expect him to succeed with motorcycles. I envy Josh his good sense; when I was seventeen I was flunking school, getting drunk every weekend, and my sole ambition in life was to avoid Vietnam.
Social commentary, even when 200 years old, can be beautifully biting.
And yours was space like the minutes inside a theater
I could opinionate about President Obama’s daring visit to Afghanistan to visit President Karzai and the American troops.
NOPE! Chuck Testa!
Let’s start with Easter Sunday…
The story is about how the Mumbai police commissioner Donald Fernandez puts all his efforts in nabbing the don, Narayan Swamy, with the help of Oscar Pinto, a young crime reporter with “The Newsroom”, one of India’s most venerable newspapers. But we see how Swamy’s ties in the media are stronger, and more effective than Fernandez can think of. How some of the “exclusive” stories were planted and how most police officials, reporters and politicians were mere pawns controlled by the don, is scripted quite brilliantly by the author.
Also factoring into the various speech patterns of the speakers is their age and their method of learning English (whether naturalistic or taught). Something that is not mentioned is their social class, which I think would make a difference, though most Americans deny the importance of social class. How much formal education each person has would also seem to make a difference, though it isn't included in the information.
So make sure you label your boxes well, and keep checking on those ones that are really important! Otherwise you have to rely on being perceptive enough to know when to go dumpster diving, or those things you learned / experienced / loved might just be pushed out.
We also took a walk down by the river exploring more of the many paths that run along there. Unfortunately, it was just after we’d picked Bradley up from school and we had Leah and Charlie, so I hadn’t taken my camera with me. I would have got some lovely shots. Ah well. And besides, I’d already got my photos for today.
Owner Ayaz Mehar, who is also a doctor, reckons the experience will give newly-qualified drivers a lesson in safety.
Colorful drawings and two elaborate models convey a visionary, never-built project by San Francisco's Ant Farm design collective. The idea was to develop a geodesic-domed Convention City in Texas in time for the 1976 U.S. Bicentennial, with an arena for real-time political debates.
This shirt (last seen here) is staying in my wardrobe post-capsule; I love ruffles on shirt, but I'm normally way too boobtastic to do them. This shirt just has the right amount.
The authority on the law replied, "The one who felt sorry for him."
10. The result should be gnocchi with an indent on one side from your finger and a pattern on the other side from the fork.
If we relate to the various sectary strives in both Islam and Judaism, we see the same centrality and acceptance of the Quran and the Chumash, whether it be the Sunni-Shi’a conflict, or the various Jewish groups either accepting or refusing the Oral Tradition, all Muslim groups accept the central status of the Quran, as well as all Jewish groups to our days have accepted the status of the Chumash. This is so central, that it might even be possible to deem a sectarian group either outside the Islamic sphere or the Jewish sphere, religious speaking, in their relation to the Quran and Chumash respectively.
The example to share it today with you is from very leetle tacking. Ooops! I slipped into Grossspeak. That is, the example I have to share with you today is interesting because it's an example of Gross working with almost no dialogue, and instead relying mostly on his visual humor. The guy could draw funny, and this comic certainly shows that.
Peace! Peace! Orestes-like I breathe this prayer!
The main plot and setting are stereotypical of high school teen movies: Preston Meyers (Embry) has been in love with Amanda Beckett (Hewitt) for 4 years — who seems to barely know he exists. During graduation, rumor has spread that Amanda and high school star jock boyfriend, Mike Dexter (Facinelli) had broken up. Rumor has also spread of a huge house party happening later that night in which the entire student body is attending. Believing that this is fate and probably his last shot, Preston decides to take it upon himself to finally express his love for Amanda at this party, while many follies impede on his various attempts.
When I woke up Saturday morning, and looked out my bedroom window, my heart sank. Mother nature was being cruel and snowed all over us over night. I got my first cancellation phone call at 10am.
Mom and I know how hard it is for people not to pet me. If we are at a store (especially a book store, like in the picture) I am in a down stay while Mom browses. Some people haven't been around calm dogs or they may be usually afraid of certain types of dogs. Mom doesn't want them to think I'm unfriendly (it is quite the opposite, as many people learn when I'm off duty) so she has my brochures to hand out.
I just returned from a ‘fabulous’ six days in New York. It really is a special time at Christmas with all the lights and excitement…..more of my adventures in a later post. I just wanted to share with you a must-get book for Christmas gift giving. I have just placed an order for a dozen to have on hand for last minute gifts for all the fabulous girlfriends, guyfriends, relatives, and for all the fabulous people you haven’t met yet.
A couple days ago, Savannah and I were sitting in the waiting room of her orthopedist. It’s a large, wide-open room and at the time, we were the only ones occupying it. After a few minutes of waiting, an elderly woman in a wheel chair rolled through the doors. She came to stop right next to us. I mean, she was as close as she could possibly get without actually crashing into us. I gave Savannah a sidelong glance meant to convey the following thoughts: She’s got the whole, entire, empty room and she chooses to sit on top of us? Personal space, lady!
How are you adding value for the end user? You need to remember that although you believe in your business, service or product, you still need to think about why the end user will use it. Whether you are changing behaviours in the workplace, offering a sustainable supply chain or helping provide cheap car journeys, you need be clear what makes you different to your competition.
I'm still not sure I will use the yellowish Loops & Threads Soft Fern green - I may replace those roses with the Sugar'n Cream Aloe Vera green roses.
At Christmas time
Wish me luck.
Rachel knew she should have stopped Jessica from walking out. That this would be the right thing to do. But she didn't.
I suppose it comes down to the human condition...as it should.
Sam Fuller made his directorial debut in 1949 with this take on the old story. I Shot Jesse James, as the title suggests, keeps the focus squarely on Bob Ford (John Ireland) and shows him in a more sympathetic light than usual. Like most film representations of these characters, there are some elements of the truth woven into the story. This film comes a little closer to reality in depicting the demise of Bob Ford than was the case with The Return of Frank James; here the name of the killer, the location and the means are broadly correct. Where the story drifts off into total fiction is the inclusion of the romantic triangle as the centrepiece of the drama.
Each 'tea' is a mixture of clear resin, layered with natural additives like rose petals, orange slices or lavender buds and then depending on the size of the teacup, one, two or maybe even three little creatures sit inside.
His allusion to Colombia sending troops to Afghanistan, as El Salvador recently has, even as the U.S. and NATO insist they are withdrawing troops from the country, is to be taken seriously as Stavridis was commander of United States Southern Command until taking up his current EUCOM and NATO positions. Southern Command’s area of responsibility comprises South and Central America and the Caribbean Sea. As such, he was the key U.S. military official in charge of American-Colombian military relations and operations.
J.D. Revezzo has long been in love with writing, a love built by devouring everything from the Arthurian legends, to the works of Michael Moorcock, and the classics. Her short fiction has been published in Dark Things II: Cat Crimes, The Scribing Ibis, Eternal Haunted Summer, Twisted Dreams Magazine and Luna Station Quarterly.
I also saw Kick-Ass with some other friends. That was definitely not what we were expecting. We didn’t pay much attention to the trailers or rating. We didn’t know much about that one other than the talk about how the movie was awesome and it was some sort of super-hero wannabe movie.
“Taking your time about it,” he answered. “High Power is threatening to take the whole block off-grid. I'm officially out to lunch and avoiding calls!”
Last month, I did the Fab Ab February workout and never missed a day. This month, I am doing Six Pack Abs and so far haven't missed any days. My goal is to not miss any. If I don't, I can say that I did two full months without missing a day of exercise.
There are still times when I see a darkness, when I feel more animal than man, I'd be lying if I said there wasn't. But one of the ways I pull myself back is to think of that day. I know, more than most people, that madness can turn to great beauty in the blink of an eye.
So what is my professional approach and context?
A handful for a snack.
These are things I’m going to do later. When I don’t have other, graded priorities. But it’s good to have them written down somewhere.
ignite your love
KNOW YOUR AREA AND HOW TO GET OUT OF IT WITH MORE THAT ONE ROUTE!
Basic Information of Table Tennis
I work, I can afford it, (through no small miracle) we are not going into debt so why the heck can’t I buy whatever it is I want? Don’t I deserve it? The answer the world gives me is yes. Yes, Abby you do work hard and that entitles you to that Venti iced Starbucks concoction of pure goodness. That entitles you to another pair of shoes, another dress. That watch that strikes your fancy makes you feel good, and you deserve to feel good. So yes, buy it. You deserve it.
Today's song on the 24 Days of Christmas on The Great Faith Adventure is Light of the Stable. One of my absolute favorite groups - Selah - does it. I will get to see them tonight at their Christmas concert at First Baptist Irving!! Yay! Thankfully there is not really much history behind the song. So I get to keep it nice and short :)
And in fact, it may very well be the workings of the Universe, in terms of karma, that the people responsible for those attacks have now had it happen to them.
Pink: (2) 1.75" x 9.5" and (2) 1.75" x 8.25"
For today, a vertical and horizontal perspective of a lavendar dawn at Tioman Island beach.
With the advent of cheap air travel in the 1960’s, Blackpool’s tourism figures declined, but it still remains Britain’s favourite seaside resort. The extra attraction of ‘Blackpool Illuminations’ brings in thousands of visitors at a time when most seaside resorts’ tourist seasons are coming to an end. The Illuminations (or ‘Lights’ as they are often called) consist of a series of lighted displays and tableau, stretching along the entire sea front (about 7 miles), from dusk until midnight, usually from the end of August to the beginning of November. This often results in spectacular traffic snarl-ups on the promenade and on all the roads leading to it too. I’ve been stuck in those snarl-ups several times!
It is an epic story. Truly. But the point is not that my son looks like a hero to his friends. It’s really a story about reaching out to others. Asking not for yourself but for others, caring about something other than yourself. And it’s about a class-act bunch of guys on the other side of the United States who saw a good deed done by one of their fans and decided to run with it.
AZERBAIJAN NEWSLETTER
What Mr. Christie must not do is let the attacks stand. Instead, his office should answer the charges in a reasoned but vehement fashion, then counter them with concrete examples of why the $65 million has to be cut. If the governor gives the environmentalists any rhetorical quarter, they will bury Christie’s agenda in an avalanche of pseudo-science talking points.
Also, you may consider turning word verification 'off' and comment moderation 'on'. This will save tons of time for everyone interested in leaving comments on all your lovely work, but still allow you to choose which comments you want to accept or decline. You do this by going into the settings tool on your blog and then editing comments accordingly.
Back to some "serious" postings. This Castella Cake was a hit back in 2009. I've always wanted to try baking it but I've read and understand that this is a very delicate cake. Being a beginner in baking, I procrastinated and finally found my guts to make it last Dec.
This fine gentleman waved me over just after I went around the bend above the market in the last photo and asked if I could give him a ride roughly four kilometers up the road to his home; I guess this is Bolivia’s version of a hitchhiker. He had walked down to the market to drop off some vegetables to sell. I talked to him as best I could on the drive up, but to be honest I could only make out about a third of what he said given his shortage of teeth. That said, he seemed to understand me well enough and was as pleasant a passenger as can be. He was kind enough to let me snap his picture as I dropped him off, in fact asking me to take a few and really getting a kick out of seeing how they turned on the camera’s viewscreen. If you look closely, you’ll see that the brim of his hat says “USA” in red, white and blue letters. His home was just off to the left of this photo, down a steep hill and past a tethered cow. As I shook his calloused hand in farewell, I felt immediately uncomfortable with the softness of my own candy-ass mitts. Damnit! Even if I have to spend an hour a day out in the yard just moving stones from one place to another and digging out weeds without a spade, I swear I’m going to toughen up these office-worker hands of mine.
This is day four of a two day project as quoted by my husband. He is awesome like that ;) He has been filling the hole above the fireplace. You know those ridiculous media niches that became obsolete once flatscreen tvs were all the rage. Yet, they continued to install these media niches in homes. I know. We have one. In our house built in 2006. My hubbie has been wanting to mount our tv over our fireplace for over a year. Since the day we looked at this house :) Here is a picture of our niche as of Saturday morning...
I was trying to pick my favourite song from the album and I couldn’t. My top 5 are (in no particular order) Rope, White Limo, Arlandria, Dear Rosemary & Walk.
And of course, everyone jumped off the bed...except for yours truly...who just sat there staring down the little beast and said, "I think GOD is punishing me guys."
The BFAward Judges, James Barclay, Hal Duncan, Maura McHugh, Esther Sherman, and Damien G. Walter, will now review the shortlist and enter into deliberations. The winners will be announced at FantasyCon in Brighton on 30 September 2012.
It's that time of the year again.
Firstly we set the CMV (current market value) of the loans at November 30th, 2009 at 100 – that’s just for ease of calculation. Next we split the 100 between Ireland (71) and the UK (29). Then we need figure out how much NAMA has paid for the loans because NAMA are paying a premium on top of the CMV – the Long Term Economic Value (LEV) premium. According to the results of Tranche 1 and 2, NAMA has valued the CMV of the assets behind the loans at €12.97bn and the Long Term Economic Value at €14.33bn (ie LEV is 10.4% higher than CMV). So we know that if the CMV was 100 then the LEV will be 110.4. NAMA pays for loans in two ways – 95% is via NAMA bonds and 5% is via subordinated debt. The subordinated debt will not be honoured if NAMA makes a loss, so from the LEV of 110.4 is deducted 5% (remember this index is about NAMA breaking even). Although NAMA is entitled deduct from the LEV a contribution for its due diligence and enforcement costs as well as a NAMA premium to cover its overall operating costs, these deductions are ignored in the calculation of the index because the assumption is that the deductions will be in fact be used to finance NAMA’s costs of due diligence, enforcement and general operation and that NAMA will break even on this contributions. Therefore the LEV minus 5% for subordinated debt is what NAMA needs recover before it breaks even.
New floors are pretty pricey (even laminate) since we’re doing 800 square feet they were not in our future for a while because of the price, but I have still been keeping my eyes out for good deals and I know exactly what I wanted. I came across this blog randomly here: http://www.theyellowcapecod.com/2011/10/31-days-of-building-characterwood.html. I got REALLY excited because I loved the floors she had and she said they looked awesome and were great for durability. And the best part is…they are CHEAP! She got them at Sam’s Club and they are hand scraped laminte. I was obsessed and after doing some research, measuring and discussing with Dan, we are going to get them! I debated on what kind of flooring to do and decided that real hardwood is way out of our budget for a while and it’s really not a great investment for our home. It’s not something we would probably see back when we sell in the future. Also, I really want durable floors that my children and other kids can beat up on and I don’t have to worry about them getting ruined. These floors fit the bill! And they are exactly the style I want too! Look how gorgeous they are:
One of the unique aspects of this motorsport budget is that rather than submitting a “business plan” on paper, I will present a 5 year (VERY DETAILED) budget that takes into account the small items that add up…right down to cleaning supplies and toilet paper !
I have an interesting life and have made numerous friends over the past 30 plus years through my art work. People appreaciate my efforts and have thrown my all sorts of curve balls in thier ideas that they would like to have turned into reality. It was June when a young lady approached me to create a special piece for her husbands birthday - she decided on a Tiki fire pit.
I was thinking about the whole Florida thing while loading some hay this morning and I had to come back in and post.
No, seriously. That’s what happens. I kid you not. The guy even screams “I’LL BUY MORE!!!” before the dog rips out his throat…am I on Earth? Tell me. Did I just get transported to some bizarre-world other dimension where nothing makes any kind of logical sense?
*Plush, cozy environment that supports baby’s back, sides and head
06. Jeux d'Enfants 1
What a mess I was, what a child
Well next Friday will be Fat Nat’s Eggs. Sounds good- organic and homemade meats.
Use your Gingersnapper Spirit to give us a proper send off and to show us what Gingersnap Creations has meant to you these last 3 years!
Operating & Lubricating Instructions
People talk about the evilness of America invading Iraq.
been trying something new in my life
6
And saw him peep within;
My master Rick and I were cruising the internet and ran into this article on Yahoo! It is another glaring example of a poor innocent Dachshund who witnessed a horrible act of vandalism. Thank-Goodness the Dachshund and his buddy were ok. Via Yahoo Sports:
Both Self-Deprecation and Arrogance make a person very status-conscious. Both types of people are concerned with where they rank compared to others. “What is my elevation — am I high or low? What is my scale — am I big or small. What is my value — am I quality or not? What is my grade — am I fine or coarse?” The lesson to be learned from this is that we are neither better nor worse than others, neither higher nor lower, neither richer nor poorer, neither more righteous nor more wicked. We are all equal.
Brian Geraghty is an alum from UFC’s TUF reality show. Chris “Bad Boy” Tickle is being walked out by Cortez “Hollywood” Coleman as well as coaches Marc Fiore and Rick Drago. Both fighters look very relaxed.
We have cleansers for our cars
Monty gets nasty, telling Mildred she has no friends (maybe because she’s too busy working to support you to make any!) except for “that bartender.” He says that in the exact same tone one might use to say “that stablehand.” Douche. And Mildred has friends—what about Bert and Ida and Wally? Mildred finds her voice and tells him she has no time to have parties and dinners because she has a business to run. He says that’s just an excuse, and then he goes for some below-the-belt hits and says that he thought she might be a lady, but she clearly wasn’t, because a lady wouldn’t care about all the money she was forking over to keep him afloat, she’d just give it to him. Mildred made him drive her daughter around to get her money’s worth. He swears he’s done taking money from her, so Mildred crumples up a $10 bill and throws it at him. Monry shoves her aside into the sofa and throws the bill into the fire. Mildred gets up and looks at him sadly. Oh, please, woman, just leave.
Being fitted for her first shoes is a new experience for your baby, and she may not take kindly to it! Try not to worry too much if your baby puts up a fuss or starts crying. The fitter should be used to measuring babies for their first shoes. If they’re not, ask for a more experienced fitter or just come back another day.
I have made a few newer variations of this and have taken it to work to let co-workers try it. I was told that it has a "bread pudding-ish" consistency, so I am working on new recipes to add some oats to absord some moisture. I do believe you can bake it for a bit longer and that will help as well. Everyone that tried it, liked it :)
The early success of the program also ties into my point earlier about market forces. Increasingly, innovation in development is coming from private-sector lessons and best practices applied to some of the world’s most vexing issues, such as income generation, job stability, basic sanitation and disease eradication. I’m finding that the organizations and projects I’m most excited about are coming from smart, often young, people thinking creatively and not being afraid to ruffle some feathers.
And put'em in the freezer! I'm lucky enough to have a second small freezer, even if we do have a small apartment. So I'm planning on buying only on sale and freezing for later.
On the website “Life More Abundant,” poster “Coralie” commented that the format of The Voice, which includes commentary in the body of the text, was a concern.
The measure, sponsored by state Sen. Tony Avella (D-Queens), applies only to the city and requires any firm that erects a foreign-language sign to also post a sign of equal size in English.
M: The internal discourse of the movement is as important as the external form.
Silent House
our footprints will
This year I'm the club's Road Captain. It is a great deal of work, and no small amount of hassle, but it is my way of giving back to the club. I look at it as paying my dues. The club is more than pine walls and trophies. The people here are family, and the organization is a living piece of history that I am proud to be a part of.
It's a good job I can't drive, because I'd be a right menace having just watched Drive Angry. The vehicular carnage is bested only by the fantastic gunplay and fight scenes. There's an action sequence in which Cage kills a whole gang of assassins during coitus. He kinda sucks at driving though; his general tactic seems to be just to drive down the wrong side of the road whilst looking angry. Although he doesn't cry, which is more than we can say for Kurt Russell.
I have a gorgeous set of books, 6 of them, in a wooden box by NICK BANTOCK , the books are the Griffin and Sabine series. I urge you to read them if you have not already, they are truly beautiful books. The theme of the books is two people who correspond by postcard and the books are full of the postcards.
I hope so. I have a debt to repay.
05. Jog Trot
Accompanying these points will obviously be doodles, sketches, and other illustrations. As an artist, these things are essential not only to how I present the information, but how I am presented to the viewer. The map’s appearance, just as that of a blog or essay, holds it’s own connotation. It’s overall aesthetic is an element in itself. As such, I want to include as many hand-drawn pictures and fonts as possible.
I fuzzy pink heart Nutella. I'm not alone, right? That stuff is heaven-sent! I've slightly altered a recipe that I found here.
a "wrench" in the form of an emergency sunday morning trip to the er
No wonder they call it the Maily Telegraph these days. Oh the journalistic transformation wrought by tax-exiled proprietors, their wonders to perform.
The Walking Dead’s plot revolves around the group’s attempts to survive. The threat of a zombie attack is ever present, but the plot is not just there to fill the space between zombie attacks. That time is used to explore tensions within the group. The series looks very real. The zombie attacks are extremely gory and lifelike. It’s not the type of series to watch before going to a Bob Katter town hall meeting.
It was just last year, in fact, when I was but a tender lamb of seventeen years. We bowled up to the place, the calm before the storm… I bleated the unfamiliar utterances of a first-timer at the disinterested bubblegum girl behind the counter. The egg-whites of her eyes contradicted her artificially darkened face. A white handkerchief was tightly bound about her withered neck. A name badge marked ‘Judy’ was pinned to her off-white shirt. She spoke with half a mind digested in a magazine, and the other in an ongoing game of dominoes, slotting a black-white counter into place as she automatically directed me to the Death-Pod in the corner of the room – thrusting a cindered pair of spindly goggles in my hapless direction as I went.
Powerline Network Adapters 200 Mbps powerline to 1 Ethernet port adapters – twin pack, Brand Zinwell, Color white, Up to 200 Mbps physical data rate with INT6400 HomePlug AV technologyHigh-security 128-bit AES encryptionultra low power consumption : 3.5 W (full run), less than 1.0 W (standby)TCP speed up to 93 Mbps, UDP up to 95 Mbps – Perfect for HD video and audio streamingUltra-compact – smallest powerline adapters in the world
To a substantial degree, digital ad agencies and digital gurus have accepted and helped spread the notion that the big idea is dead. The question is, why?
Well I hope it's true that all those April showers we had will indeed bring May flowers. I am so ready for lots of sunshine and blossoms! So today I am sharing a floral card I created using the wonderful Penny Black clear stamp set "Illumination Flowers".
I managed to watch the first episode without smashing my telly, but last night's abortion had me gaping in stunned disbelief at the sheer jaw-dropping audacity of the trash writing on display. Dickens must be spinning furiously in his grave. People who've not read his books will think HE wrote this drivel. This utter crap. This cheap, tawdry teen soap.
My earlier twit today reads: A woman with advanced thinking knows when she needs to stand in front, beside or behind. Because such woman knows when she has to lead, befriend or serve.
In a regular lodge initiation, the candidate goes through a dramatic ceremony, and is then given a set of meditative and ritual exercises to practice; these are meant to reinforce the pattern communicated in the initiation ritual. The practitioner of self-initiation skips the ceremony, or does an abbreviated form of it on his or her own, and then plunges straight into the meditative and ritual exercises to get the same effect. Some magical schools prefer to use self-initiation, since it quickly weeds out those who aren’t willing to do the hard work that magic requires. Other schools avoid it, but it’s a widely used method, and a great many of you have been through it whether you’re aware of that fact or not.
If I wanted to be kind, to myself, I’d say that The Death of Ivan Ilyich is about a boring man looking back on his life and wondering if he’s wasted it. This would be kind because, even though I (and probably most modern people) can identify with some of what makes Ivan’s life so meaningless, I can always say, “Well, I’m not that guy, and I have time to make more of myself.” But only engaging with the “looking back on one’s life” theme recontextualizes the story as one about life, which means I’m making one of Ivan’s largest mistakes: ignoring death.
Contractor: That's wonderful! How many hours per week, and what rate of pay is this job offering?
In my last post, I mentioned that Santa Clause had come to our house early. Mr. K and I don't really buy each other Christmas presents. We really enjoy shopping for the kiddos and since we tend to buy stuff we want throughout the year, and even at Christmas time!
